I've masked three separate Magnolia stamps together to create this spring like scene and used spring colours too, of course it's coloured using my distress re-inkers,
If the characters do not notice this, it will be pointed out to them by the skald at their home, who has waited to hear the outcome of their journey. He tells them that the Princess of Kent suffered so greatly that she went mad, scourged herself until her wounds poured out her lifeblood then fled to the woods, calling all of the gods to grant her justice and revenge. Many years later, as her father lay dying, she returned to her family, briefly. She showed no injury from her time away, having grown into a proud and forceful woman, save that her left hand, now covered by a gauntlet, was never seen to move without the prompting of her right, lying flat again if not held bent by its partner. After burying her father she left again, taking with her such few sections of her maiden-price as were still in the hall. No-one has seen her since.
Sam bit her lip. So, this had something to do with Mum and the divorce. But her mother had never said anything about a living doll either. Nice family secret: a wacko doll hidden in an old trunk in a secret room in her dad's office. She sighed. Other people had barrels of money or famous ancestors. Not the Liffeys. They always had to be different.
THEN....after all those days of work I came to THIS. GIANT, GAPING, TEAR INDUCING, HOLES in the original ceiling. Our kitchen has its own roof...a roof I never wanted to see from the UNDER side. From as far as I can discern, a genius home improver before myself had crawled into the little crawl space above the kitchen, broke huge holes in the original plaster and lathe to allow for the blown in insulation to migrate in between the two layers of ceiling. Broken. Huge broken holes. This discovery took years off my life, for reals.
A new favorite game is to open the tupperware tops drawer and empty it, then proceed to spread the tops all over the kitchen and living room floor. Fun.
- my hearts aches
Outline Sticker, various designs in gold and silver x 6
Then a birdlike woman was waxing poetic about her depression mix? The yogi will put together a personalized kit to heal your most pressing physical & psychological "concerns." A combo of emollients & quenchers(these are known in my little backwater town as lotions & drinks), breathing techniques, exercise regimens, & mantras....@ $499 + tax. Apparently a popular number in yoga.
Some great news from Full Figured Fashion Week: the winner of The Face of Full Figured Fashion Week has been announced! Congratulations to Venessa De La Rosa!!! Can't wait to meet this beautiful and formidable woman in NYC. It must have been very difficult for the judges with such amazing women in the running, but this Venessa's got it all! :D Here's a bit more about Venessa from the Full Figured Fashion Week webpage:
Vickie wrote a thoughtful response to LZ's piece, "LZ Granderson Needs a Hug. He's having a tantrum." Vickie reminds us what it's like to be a child and she points out something that came to my mind when I was reading LZ Granderson's original piece:
State-Sanctioned “Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell” – “Any government (local, state, or federal), private or public institution, or business that denies full equal rights to the LGBT community, in effect supports (condones, fuels, advocates for) homophobia, hate crimes, and the consequences of fear and hate (e.g. those in our community who’ve committed suicide because they did not feel like a valued member of this society).”
Match 1: Jeff Hardy defeated Kurt Angle by countout
First-inventor-to-file (FITF)
Never looked like cameron
I really like it and keep waiting for something bad to happen. It's just too good. No one is monitoring me, no one hassels me, I keep up with my time, and I do everything at my own pace. I could get used to this, if I would stop waiting for the "other shoe to fall" or whatever.
I know. We already have enough to worry about with climate change and oil and all that. But the global economy is a shit storm and our whole planet is pretty much suffocating. So what’s another huge threat to our existence, right?
I kind of see your point.
That I was his only one
Sadako: "And the canine doing the most to perpetuate rape and sexual assault myths."
For more than 25 years, Bob Lambert was a special branch undercover officer, actively undermining the work of protest groups including anti-racist groups.
"DEADLY CAMPAIGN has it all—political intrigue, family warfare and, best of all, a hero. If the line between comedy and tragedy is indeed thin, then Orloff is a master tightrope walker."
To meet the end of this
But wait! There’s more! If you are within the first 1,000 lucky patrons you will receive a GoPro HD Hero2 Motorsport Edition camera pack to film all of your hoonage.
A drabble is a story of exactly 100 words.
UP TO 48% OFF Slip on a pair of Avia Sneakers and grab the kiddos for a run, jog, or walk in the park.
Thanks so much for stopping by! I finally got my sewing mo~jo back yesterday and made several things, but if you want to know what they are, you're just gonna have to stop by next time. (Hint~some of them are pictured on this post). Can you guess what they are??? I know, I'm such a tease, LOL.
I used the smallest scooper I had to fill the mini cupcake pan. Once the mini cupcakes were cooled, I piped Hello Kitty with cream cheese frosting, and gave her a pink nose and bow.
Well, I don't play Dungeons and Dragons, if that's what you're asking. But I did buy this shirt today:
April 28 2012 - Dutch MP Geert Wilders represents the more than 1,5-million Dutch voters who at the previous election -- and despite a massive demonisation media-campaign against him -- voted to support the third-largest political party in The Netherlands, a small northern European trading-nation of 16,5-million citizens. Read further...
Frankincense. A fantastic rich non greasy cream carefully made from spring water, sweet almond, thistle and argan oils, glycerin, vitamin E, enriched with pure essential oils. Full of fantastic Frankincense which is believed to have an anti ageing effect on the skin. Contains vegetable emulsifiers and a more natural preservative
Most of us, at one time or another, have found ourselves in a relationship that has disintegrates to a point where one becomes little more than a complaints department. I know I sure have. Amy, you're too good for me. Amy, you've ruined me for other women. It can be terribly exhausting.
The People with an empty, imposturous Christian spiritual life generally still turn to a simplified Old Testament version gospel, practice and not a real New Testament based Gospel for they even turn to idolatry to wrongfully try to compensate for their definite void, guilt feelings, their failure to reach, acquire a deeper Holy Sprit led, filled, spiritual life in Christ…. They practice idolatry instead and now falsely promote, do encourage the worship of men, prophecy, creeds, denominations, history, doctrines, things, places, books, videos, rather most anyhting over solely worshipping now God, the Holy Spirit, and Jesus. The devil leads them into this. Truly Jesus Christ does not talk to ythem and they never were fully baptized with the holy spirit as many of us here were..
Being able to care for my children in completely unselfish ways (when I'd rather be doing anything else than getting puked on) has a healing quality to those childhood wounds I picked up telling me I wasn't worth it. (I grew up with a *profound* belief that I was not worthy of anything good, especially love and time or praise.) It feels good to give them the reinforcements that tell them, in not so many words, "YOU ARE IMPORTANT AND LOVED" and "I WOULD DO ANYTHING FOR YOU" - even let you puke in my lap or have a nose-bleed all over my shirt (3 of those today!!) just because it comforts you and is easier for you to have to endure this crap in your mama's arms.
Constant compliments from brothers and sisters
### ODT Online Sat, 21 Apr 2012
So, lessons learnt then: the modest terrain exceeded the capabilities of the brakes, the tyres, the gear ratio and most importantly the rider. It’s eight years since I did any kind of off-roading. That was on the South Downs, with a full complement of 24 ratios and decent tyres. And I should probably have bled and serviced the rim brakes in the intervening years.
Personally, the question in my mind was, “How do you forgive someone who can’t seem to stop hurting you.” And the answer I came up with, was: Compassion. It was the only thing that fit. Thanks to the grace of an angel, and in this instance I do believe I am speaking metaphorically about a very beautiful person who has inspired me every time I have tried to look in her direction, lately I’ve been reading a book about the Dhali Lama’s approach to living happily. As a result, thankfully, thoughts of compassion have recently been readily available at the forefront of my brain. And after spending some time flirting with the notion of trying to forgive someone, internally, who seems incapable of not harming others by his actions, myself included, revisiting the notion of forgiveness I was delighted to find that compassion seemed a likely key to unlocking an otherwise impossible problem.
Just a quick note today to say that I'm attending GenCon this year. I seem to be on the every-other-year program (2008, 2010, 2012).
Kentmere was quiet and sheltered. Castle Crag and its neighbouring gnarled knuckles of rock diverted sharp gusts from the pretty village. I found the path to the right of the farm at Kentmere Hall and climbed the pass. A climber with boulder mat overtook me looking for a quiet evening of searching for handholds. He advised me to look for the sheep to find a suitable spot to bed down for the night.
Aqualine Liquidlast Liner (MAC)
Infidelity, the dark father that spawned this brood.
This will be followed by an anniversary function in Cultúrlann Uí Chanáin, Great James’ Street, immediately after the 7.30pm organised by the Starrs family.
Cele defended himself against the findings saying, to his knowledge, only a court of law can find him guilty.
I hope one day we get to meet in real life. But until then, I will enjoy our twitter/blog/facebook conversations and Draw Something/Words With Friends games...sometimes all the same time.
Jacksonian argues that when the Senate became a directly elected body and no longer represented Statehouses, taxation and other federal usurpations of Constitutional bounds became rife. In other words, the federal government could and did use its power to begin punishing the states, regulating local affairs and interfering in every sort of arcane transaction.
and the majority of us
The very LAST Wednesday Stamper challenge is simply to use at least one rubber stamp. I'm so sorry to see the Wednesday Stamper challenges ending. They were some of my favourite play dates with myself!
On the same night and the following 2 days, i was just on the net, catching up with the Bersih news in KL and a few locations, reading blogs, their stories, the strong unity that they see on that day, how each and everyone helped one another when things just went chaotic and their personal encounters with the teargas. But really, is there such a need for teargas and water cannons and barbed wires? Are they criminals?
Shakespeare, translated, so no rhymes or sounds or
And--oh yes--if authors who didn't realize their works were included in the database discover this only after a publishing deal has been brokered, they are out of luck. Spraggs writes, "If an author misses the six months' window to reclaim a book, then even if he/she subsequently proves ownership of the rights (and that may well be a difficult process), then it will most likely still remain subject to the terms of a contract negotiated by the collecting society. That contract (if exclusive) will then become non-exclusive, but it will still last for up to five years."
This year is going to be a big year for the super hero movie. We have The Dark Knight Rises, The Amazing Spider-Man, and The Avengers all coming out in one year. While I am excited about all three (especially the end of The Dark Knight trilogy), I absolutely can not wait for The Avengers. This movie has a lead in that is unprecedented, in that it is building off of four other movie franchises (granted not all four were huge successes). It even managed to keep all but one of the original actors from those separate franchises. That is insane!
Hairy man-like creatures living in the woods, sea serpents descended from dinosaurs, or blood-sucking flying monsters may be real or they may be figments of the imagination. For centuries humans have claimed to see amazing and sometimes terrifying creatures that consistently elude capture. Sometimes footprints and other forms of evidence have been claimed to have been found, but often these discoveries have been proven to be hoaxes. Perhaps one day the proof will be absolute, but until then these creatures will remain mysteries.
Planetary Resources faces huge risks, not the least of which are the customary ones faced by any startup. MIT's Technology Review has a thought-providing article on the difficulties that energy startups face today, and many of the points it makes would also apply to a space development company. It's not entirely irrelevant that the company's announcement came in the same month that one of our last space shuttles was flown to its new home in the Smithsonian's Udvar-Hazy aerospace museum not far from where I live. In order to succeed they must do something no one else has done before, in an environment as unforgiving as any that humanity has faced. Yet while I'm not in a position to bet my retirement savings on an idea like this, I'm very glad that some of those who have made their fortunes starting companies in other industries are willing to wager a portion of their wealth on this proposition. In the slim chance that they win their bet, it will change the world.
“You and I are told increasingly that we have to choose between a left or right, but I would like to suggest that there is no such thing as a left or right. There is only an up or down–up to a man’s age-old dream, the ultimate in individual freedom consistent with law and order–or down to the ant heap totalitarianism, and regardless of their sincerity, their humanitarian motives, those who would trade our freedom for security have embarked on this downward course.” -Ronald Regan
I buy a rotisserie chicken at the grocery. If they have the organic ones, I buy that. I get either "traditional" or "lemon pepper" flavored. Usually the first day I just eat part of the chicken and then the next day I make chicken salad (breast meat, apples, celery, grated carrot with light mayo and pepper) and whatever is left over I put in a big pot and boil it down. With the skin still on.
“Mom, I took my shower about 2 hours ago.”
Jesus returns to the Galaxy’s Greatest Comic for the first time in more than a decade with his art on this Tale, 'Birth of Mazzikim', which appears in 2000 AD prog 1737 – available now from all good newsagents and comic shops.
dreamed I could fall so very much in love with these
GOWN
The ingredients to make your own Washi Tape really are endless, but here are some to help get you started!
Gender: ALL BOY
Disitn picked up the ball in the Everton half and, with Suarez looming, rather than play it down the line, or smack it into the stands, he opted to pass back to Howard. The back pass was woefully short Suarez seized on it and, despite the onrushing Howard and the attentions of Heitinga, kept his head to coolly knock it home.
So when I saw the two of them a few weeks ago, it wasn't weird at all. I sat and talked with them for over an hour without realizing how much time had passed. I never once felt uncomfortable, and I actually think the three of is might have been the most comfortable with the situation out of everyone else in the room.
The film, set in the year 2084 in a dystopian world controlled by two states called Euroamerica and New Shanghai, includes many more political overtones than the original. The main character (Farrell) begins to have violent nightmares and suspects that he is a spy that has had his memory replaced, but he does not know which side he is supposed to be on or anything else. Biel plays a freedom fighter/prostitute he teams up with, Beckinsale plays his wife, and Cranston as the President of Euroamerica.
Dreaming: of impossible
In thinking of how this thought could be argued, I realized how easy it is to justify intruding on others by rationalizing that their actions somehow affect my well being. Or better yet, the welfare of The Children (closely related to the ubiquitous THEY). That reasoning allows me to exert authority over everyone everywhere. It's that butterfly effect thing.
Should you manage to make this pilgrimage, be sure to take the ten minute walk around the perimeter of the place to the factory outlet store where you'll be able to buy as much chocolate as you can eat for knock down prices. I got my fill, believe you me. A few more pictures here.
What did he expect? He gave it his best, but if he could beat her, he’d be a bloody legend.
Dozens of vandals attacked Union Square late Friday night, smashing windows at some of the nicest stores in the city. Grant Street was hit hard with seven stores suffering damage.
who think things are essentially separate and can be gained and lost
The goal in genocidal rape is not merely to hurt people. Much less is the goal simply to have sex. Group destruction is the goal. Sexual violence is not simply some ancillary tool to this goal. Indeed, because of the peculiar nature of rape and sexual torture, it is particularly suited to genocide. In war, the destructive effects of rape are largely beside the point. In genocide, the destruction is the point.
This is a good, hearty meal. Not fancy in the slightest but good nonetheless. If you are into calories and what not, each serving has 320 calories, 7.2 grams of fat and 11.3 grams of fiber. That's 6 Weight Watchers points. Not too shabby. I made the full recipe and froze half, I should really freeze meals more often.
20If you are turned away from the Lord and become the servants of strange gods, then turning against you he will do you evil, cutting you off, after he has done you good.
Ah yes, agree to disagree as long as the agenda moves forward. The actual conclusion reads,
Totally wrong, it's actually a little "dorpie" in the South East called Colchester. Now Colchester is not the most glamorous town but it does have a lot of history, and this makes it a premium place to visit on a weekend.
Thank you, Stéphane, for selecting the perfect place to celebrate and for organizing the entire evening.
Heading west from Holmwood station, a narrow footpath between a neatly clipped conifer hedge on one side and a less formal native field boundary hedge on the other takes me to a country lane lined with beech, sycamore and shiny-leaved, bright-berried holly – a sign that the year is heading to its inevitable conclusion. Over hedges and down wide ornately-gated driveways fringed with stately Cedar of Lebanon are glimpses of grandiose Victorian country houses – their presence often only betrayed by the tall gables and taller chimneys I catch sight of between the trees. This is an expensive and exclusive part of the world in which to live.
And I hope you love it too
The course is called Consciousness, Meaning and Life Purpose.
(Fareda continues to tell her story as though she is oblivious to Anwaar’s reaction.)
And finally a lovely cornfield with a few more treatments trying to give a soft look, taking on board some of the comments when some of these images were on one of Bink's blog post - Note: she was standing on a path through the corn, we would never damage a farmer's crops to get a shot.
“This dream is short, but it is happy” …
Our might
in the hope that you were wound
Sitting in a cafe in LA drinking iced cafe con leche. Behind me a model earnestly explaining to a friend: “They say I'm emerging. And you know, I decided I prefer that-- I'd rather be emerging than defined, wouldn't you?”
My heart often echoes that cry. I long for everything to be made right—Eden restored—no, even better! Heaven come to earth, and God’s will being done on earth as in heaven.
There were multiple Christmas episodes of MASH but I think I like this one best. It comes as just the twelveth episode of the entire series. Hawkeye is going to play Santa for a bunch of local kids when he gets the word that there are injured GIs pinned down just 20 miles away. Next comes that famous shot of him being lowered from a helecopter into a fox hole with his Santa suite on. The episode takes place at Christmas but there really aren't a lot of Christmas references. Its the first episode where he writes home to his dad and narrates most of the episode.
Elected as a Conservative councillor in 2008 he defected to the EDP in 2009, Cllr Goldspink’s seat is up for election tomorrow but he will not be defending it and the EDP are not standing a candidate in the ward.
Series: Yes!
Both the Musa boys were, as we have already shown, accessing the same account to cover their expenses during education in Australia. If this was not a business relationship then Musa Aman needs to be clear about what kind of relationship he did have with Michael Chia.
There's nothing better than being awoken by the sweet cooing sounds of my baby girl on my first Mother's Day.
It’s time for the Mexican government, and its citizens, to stop feeding parasitically off the United States and to start taking care of its/their own needs.
:: I picked up a beautiful hand sewn quilt facing made of lovely vintage fabrics... it needs a backing but I'm nervous about sewing it by hand myself... I'm more of a machine quilter but can't help but feel a machine would ruin the quilt's beauty
The one thing I will say about the review now is about the review’s subheading: Video Games 101. My overall feeling on Fez is that is is the videogame equivalent of Hugo: a game about the history and making of games. I often joke to people that Hugo is like a film 101 course hidden in a movie, so the “video games 101″ thing is a reference to that. I’m not saying it’s an easy or beginner’s game, but rather a fundamental textbook, if you will, for examining games.
Joyce suggested I buy it and then plan on going to the
I folded the paper on the score lines and and then for the center one, I folded it in opposite directions. I cut my different papers to length and put them on wherever I wanted on the card.
Two realisations: First, much (though, not all) of my rather grim attitude can be directly attributable to my reflections on the political front. Simply put -- it's ridiculous. It's a joke, it's a headache, it makes you question humanity over and over, etc etc etc. I watched a John Stewart clip the other day where he joked about indefinite detention for Americans; I couldn't even laugh at that because I was so incensed. Yes, the politics is like a hydra wherein every terrible story or major gaffe you dismiss, several more inexplicably surface to taunt you.
Puerto Rican Officials ask FCC for Broadband Help: Say dealing with issue as part of USF reform will take too long
For monuments to endure.
I'm currently reading Remains of the Dead by Iain McKinnon, which ties in with Domain. At the start of Domain, a small group of survivors are found by a helicopter crew from the research ship. However, the helicopter only has a limited passenger capacity, so some of the group are whisked away and Domain tells their story. Remains concentrates on the group left behind.
Reporters Without Borders condemns the beatings that two news photographers received from local police and members of the Central Reserve Police Force (CRPF) while covering clashes between police and demonstrators on 19 August in the Nowhatta old town district of Srinagar, the capital of the northern state of Jammu and Kashmir.
We are going to visit our realtor today. He is a friend so it is a double treat.
7.GOVERNMENT ISSUE "Snubbing"
My name is Andrew Christman and I am the 3rd generation owner/operator of The Ohio Exterminating Co., Inc. and I am currently the President of the Ohio Pest Management Association (OPMA). I would first like to thank you for the opportunity to testify today as a proponent for HR 182. Before getting into the importance of this resolution, I thought it might be helpful for me to give you a bit about my background as well as the history of bed bug control in the United States.
. marketing Postcard (back and front)
I said, “No, why do you ask?”
I would conclude that the Holy Bible is not a mere fairy tale book as claimed by non-believers but really God’s work. Its placement of time when the events happened could be verified. Any holes could have been pinpointed if found wrong or misaligned.
The legislation, which the Obama administration plans to submit to Congress next year, raises fresh questions about how to balance security needs with protecting privacy and fostering technological innovation. And because security services around the world face the same problem, it could set an example that is copied globally.
Off went the gun! My dad and I ran together for the first 3 miles but at mile 4 there was a slight up-hill and I kicked it in gear. Looking at my HR monitor I saw that I was going a bit too hard as I didn’t want to start my push until after Torrey Pines hill. However I was really afraid that my friend Linzay was going to catch me!
I also have my two youngest, twins, who have just launched their teen years. Yeah baby....hold on.
The negatives: As it currently stands, this concept is quite futuristic and threatens jobs, which is not likely to make a big splash anytime soon. Also, as it doesn’t currently feature ads, it’s missing an opportunity to stand out.
Because of this phenomenon I don't generally put that much faith in the excitement generated by hosts and guests who for the most part have an "axe to grind" because the majority benefit from the stock market going higher.
Changes and notes:
"Dave," my dad said at dinner, "it's time you got yourself a summer job."
"Me ma mo Akye ooh" Nana said,
And I am over-the-moon excited.
It is feared the Royal Gurkha Rifles, who have served alongside the British Army for almost 200 years, will be disproportionately affected relative to their ranks, which total 3,500.
Not being able to pay your debts, especially bank debts that were not entirely of your own making, is not an excuse for a country, or an individual, to borrow more.
Plump it Up: After you’ve applied your lip gloss or lipstick, use shimmery product like eye shadow or an eyebrow highlighter to make a small dot in the very center of your lips. Lightly blend to create natural looking shading that gives the illusion of fuller lips.
It was in that moment that I realized 6-year-olds and grown-ups have a lot in common. It was also in that moment when I realized that it’s my job to help him harness his 20 seconds of courage, when needed, and to teach him “how” to do that as quickly as possible. It’s my job, and you can bet your paralegal behinds, I’m going to fully embrace it. And you know what — I’m not going to just assist Gavin with mustering his 20 seconds of insane courage. I’m going to start seizing my own 20 seconds every chance I get.
"This is not my person! Save us! Stop barking and bite her, Fergie! Do I have to do everything myself? Stop laughing, you cretins! You there, fat man, drop the camera! Help us! She'll kill us all!" (page 22)
But as time marches on and our world shrinks with personal blogs popping up from all over the globe, Asia looks less and less romantically exotic. Globalization is making gelatos, sorbets and coffees popular in the big Asian cities. Even the Chinese and East Indians who have money are jumping on the European wine kick –their romanticization of the West.
Arab-American Psychiatrist Wafa Sultan Blasts Islam, the Prophet Muhammad and Sheik Al-Qaradhawi, and States: When You Criticize Their Prophet, It Is As If You Chopped Off Muslims’ Noses
If you have read my past bullying experience stories, then you might recall that 7th grade was the culmination of years of bullying that I experienced in Lexington, MA. As this story came bubbling back to the surface of my mind, it also reminded me of maybe why this incident even happened. I still think that there might be things I did to cause the bullying. One thing I know that happened to me is that I went from being a very outgoing and maybe even vocal 7-year-old when we moved to Lexington, to being a withdrawn and timid 13-year-old who worried and felt threatened all the time.
In fact, the philosophical similarities between unschooling and Sudbury schooling are so extensive, I’ve often borrowed from the thoughts of unschoolers to help assure families that trusting their children’s drive is not only valid, but leads to the most effective learning. And that in turn reminds me that unschoolers and Sudbury families have this in common as well: many of our relatives, friends, and acquaintances think we’re crazy and/or putting our children at risk. So sharing our successes—concrete reminders, large and small, of how (and how well) freedom works—seems like one big favor we could do for each other.
But, for the most part, most of our weekends with the twins are spent with all four kiddos dancing around and geting along like this....
It’s time the Malaysian government did as well.
(1) How far away from the sun is it? Use an outstretched fist or hand at full extension. That’s a pretty standard measure that will get you close.
We should all be aware and savvy enough by now to know that there are many who exploit panic for profit. That is a given. Yes, some have, indeed, selfishly positioned themselves to profit from carbon emissions reductions and the like. Anybody who has done their own research by now knows that Al Gore, Mr. Non-Integrity, positioned himself on the board of the carbon emissions trading commission to line his pockets with the gold of hysteria even before he went out on stage to present his global warming message.
And He said to him, “You have rightly judged.” Then He turned to the woman and said to Simon, “Do you see this woman? I entered your house; you gave Me no water for My feet, but she has washed My feet with her tears and wiped them with the hair of her head. You gave Me no kiss, but this woman has not ceased to kiss My feet since the time I came in. You did not anoint My head with oil, but this woman has anointed My feet with fragrant oil. Therefore I say to you, her sins, which are many, are forgiven, for she loved much. But to whom little is forgiven, the same loves little.”
Kaspar – Lars Woldt
So I had a go at aping the style of a new testament letter to talk about a few things. The thing that I find most unusual about writing in this style is the very assured and direct pedagogical tone. I suppose that Paul, John and Peter are able to talk in this manner because of their position in the church. I.e. church leaders and planters. I have none of that authority and so it feels strange to write in that manner.
This is just to touch base with y'all. Today I finished my stickpin/charm item for a swap I joined, the hostess is Allyson. I'll be putting her blog info when I upload my video on my beautiful pins/charms.
Go ahead...grab that banana!! :)
I had just been discussing with my dear family the very words to put on my husband's headstone - including words sucn as "Forever in our hearts...." I was assured the words I had chosen were very nice. I had put lots of emotional effort into looking at all the headstones in the cemetery where he is buried & deciding roughly what I wanted to make it perfect & honorable to him. Now I haven't a clue. To the outside world & to my boys, I'm living a lie. I must go on being the grieving widow, or should I ? I feel I have to do the headstone as it is the done thing but it is meaningless to me, now. How on earth do I get out of this one? Please Somebody design a headstone for me. It is too much for me to bear.
On Gepetto: It’s amazing to me how so many people here have similar resentments, and so few of them actually draw the lines and recognize the connections. Gepetto tells Jiminy that the debt he owes can never be repaid-that debt being depriving Gepetto of his parents. Therefore, he should just let Gepetto….send two small children into a world where they’re not only deprived of parents, but everything else familiar??? Great thinking, that!
He created a day of rest for you and me. It’s a reminder that the universe can exist without our involvement and labor. It’s a re-ordering of our perspective, so that we remember it is God who is essential and not us.
"You need more?"
Our pillows are eco-friendly specifically in the type of silk that we use. All of our pillows are produced with hand loom raw silk. The benefits of using hand loom silks are many. First, hand loom weaving is vastly better for the environment than power loom weaving. Basically, a power loom is a huge machine that automates the weaving process and requires little human labor and emits a significant amount of pollution. Hand loom weaving is all done by human hand and involves no machinery. As a result, handloom fabrics produce ZERO carbon emissions.
Well, that's some of the fun stuff I've been up to! I'll be posting recipes for lots of these later on. Now, I'm off for a fun evening with the girls, plus tomorrow is the craft fair!
Now that I have teenagers - who can read, compute, cook, speak, write, draw, and are becoming amazing young adults... I have the proof that God really IS capable of doing something greater than me - through me. I wouldn't take credit for anything along this homeschooling journey I've been on. If I could sum up my entire decade-plus journey of homeschooling in a picture, it would be the image of Jesus asleep on the boat as the waves tossed and turned, and me shaking him and yelling at him that we are about to "drown"! You probably know the ending to that story... the part where He told the waves to be still and rebuked the doubting and terrified apostles for having such little faith. The bottom line is that there's nothing He can't handle - and even if it looks pretty stormy, if I just keep moving forward with the end goal in mind, He'll get us there.
I can’t help but wonder if these guys would feel more confident if they’re dressing better? Or if they’re dressing like that because they’re not confident. Either way – someone needs to inform them that they need to get some self confidence – RELAX a little around girls.. And go shopping.
He has good reason to distrust Nigerian politicians. Nigeria sets the bar when it comes to corruption. He, like many, has become so cynical he can barely tolerate the words "hope", "justice" and "Nigeria" in the same sentence.
extortionist blackmailing pedophile warmongering purveyors of human
SYLVANIA
Rounds 18-24: Knit
and say
If you’re thinking about starting a garden, the first thing you need to consider is what type of garden you will have. There are many different choices and often it can be hard to pick just one, but hopefully you can narrow it down. But by narrowing it down, you’ll make the gardening experience easier on yourself and the plants. If all your plants are similar, then it shouldn’t be very hard to care for them all. So here are some of the main garden ideas for you to choose from.
The larger piece of Riding Hood Red was embossed with the Elegant Bouquet folder then I sponged some Riding Hood Red on it giving kind of a suede look to the piece. Then I cut the Dotted Ribbon Border piece in half and adhered it to each end of the DSP. Thanks for stopping by.
Basically, I almost never ever hardly ever actually enjoy the bite I'm taking *in that* moment. ... And yet, wasn't I eagerly anticipating that very bite sometime earlier in the day?
Today we celebrate the joyous occasion of the marriage of His Royal Highness Prince William of Wales K.G. with Miss Catherine Middleton. His Grace wishes them many long and happy years together.
"Look, I don't know where you're going with this. But you must have forgotten that rum wasn't as popular in our village twenty years ago. All three of those who'd disappeared last year were hopeless drunkards"
Here’s an example. Do you believe in Father Christmas? Most dull adults will say ‘no of course not’. Most of the people I hang around with will say, ‘yes’ because they’re a facetious bunch. But the more we think about it, the more that opinion is correct.
There is a variety of colors on this card, but I like how the scallops made them look somewhat like a wreath -- though I kinda wish I'd moved the ribbon upwards a bit more. All-in-all, this card came together quickly once I had the stamp font adjusted how I wanted it. =)
5. Farewell (3:14)
What is the ‘holy’? Obviously God – we tend the holy when we take the time to recognize and pay attention to God and God’s presence in our lives, be that in our own personal prayer time or when we worship with others.
I’m not even talking about the whole Scientology aspect either. His smile is just a little to “off” for me.
Ask for help : Call a friend and say, “I’m going through a hard time. Do you have a few minutes just to listen?” Have a family meeting and say, “Our lives have been a lot different since grandma got sick. I’m spending more time with her. Let’s figure out together how we’ll get everything done.”
Tri Yann are a French band from Nantes (Breton: Naoned) in the départment of Loire-Atlantique, Brittany, who play traditional Breton Celtic music.
And though we feel like refugees sometimes - dirty, tired, scared, numb - His plan is for us to travel right into His presence. And that can be, well, anywhere. Even on the way to get pizza.
Newton Covert (Grandpa)
This tournament was a big deal. It was held in the UniDome - the domed football stadium for the University of Northern Iowa. Competing in these things is not for the faint of heart, although more than once I've pinched myself....
Tosh, I say. Also, Pah!
When push comes to shove, look for Europe in general to eventually take a hard right.
Congratulations Donna!! Please email me (Joanne) by clicking here, please include your full name and address and I will pass on your details to Emma, who'll send out your prize to you.
Walls were usually wall papered, or painted in rich colors, or both. There was always trim and usually several complementary colors.
-Blogger has looked after me (loyalty to platform).
Where is the pleasure? In the writing? In the reading? In the sharing? In the discussion?
I won two giveaways, Sandi's of The Primitive Skate salt dough creations giveaway. An awesome assortment made prim perfect with muted colors just the way I like them. Sandi did an excellent job with them. I mean it is Mother's Day weekend and I am a mother, which is why my #1 son bought me white roses to show his respect for his momma.
Today? Not so much. My new stereotypical view of New York City is that it’s full of rich people and no one is allowed to show art that is in any way made of cow dung. Mutant Turtles would stand no chance here.
analyzing all her entrails and components,
In the same edition of the Review, Gilbert Adair, paying tribute to the innovative novelist Alain Robbe-Grillet who died last week, expresses much the same opinion (although presumably he doesn't share Steiner's faith in metaphor as the defining characteristic of fiction, since Robbe-Grillet famously set out to 'emancipate literature from the seductive tyranny of metaphor which he accused of anthropomorphising the material world'.)
My mom is an amazing person. I can't make this stuff up.
Look, geniuses. Nothing is free. Nothing. Somewhere, somehow, everything has to be paid for, including healthcare. You can feel free to rail against that reality, but reality will simply ignore the hell out of you and continue moving right along.
In-dash Mechless AM/FM, MP3, WMA Digital Media Receiver with remote
Harold Washington College
Yesterday on the way to work, I heard a remarkable piece on NPR's Morning Edition about Donna Britt. Donna Britt is an author and a mother who is also Black. She and her sons explained how, beginning in their pre-teens, Donna would prepare them for a world of potential judgment and prejudice by telling them how to act in public to avoid drawing attention to themselves or appearing suspicious. Her sons told stories of how they have responded to provocation and suspicion throughout their lives. It was eye-opening and heartbreaking, because as a White male I have never had to think about those things.
Being unsure about where you’re going and not knowing how to get there makes even a simple trip an adventure. After all, if you know where you’re going and how to get there, there are usually, unless you are unbelievably stupid, no decisions left that would impede your progress towards your goal. But an adventure by its very nature means most decisions you make, if wrong, could force abandonment of the voyage and require you to return home.
I should know better but it’s just not the case
So I got 20 books for around $5 difference.
We keep trying to encourage her to practice proper walking but she’ll only do it when in the “right mood.” And when this “right mood” does strike, she like to be rewarded every couple of steps by claps. She gets up, toddles, stops and stands, claps and looks to us to clap, and then maybe takes a couple more steps. Or falls. And then starts knee walking.
One of Lady GaGa’s earliest hits similarly recounts being so bombed that she has little idea of where she even is. In “Just Dance,” GaGa has had so much to drink that she “can’t see straight anymore” and has little idea how her “shirt got turned inside out.” If one of my friends reached this state, my advice would be to return home and sleep it off. GaGa, however, suggests that it might be the perfect time to hook up with somebody dancing in the club “And now there’s no reason at all,” she warbles, “ why you can’t leave here with me.” Well, no reason except that the previous stanzas suggest that she is entirely likely to puke on whatever guy she is taking home. Some people are into that, I suppose.
Checkpoint 303 then took to the stage and took the willing members of the audience on a journey. This journey took in a sound- and visual-scape welded with rumbling beats, and dotted with gunfire to scenes of walls, war, occupation; dancing old men and chanting women; fizzing UN logos and footage of fighter jets taking off. Part aesthetic, part journalistic, their set was at once surreal and hyper-realistic, capturing daily lives from around the Middle East and reworking them into a staccato, non-linear narrative whole.
Winner : Southampton Arms - London
Fuck em'! They ain't getting my vote again! I’m saying that I think you’re shit and the system is wrong, and I’m not going to support your bollocks OK?!
This should frost approximately 24 Cupcakes.
Freeset is located in Calcutta, India, helping to free women from human trafficking by providing them employment with dignity through sewing bags. Every woman is provided medical insurance, retirement, daycare for their children, classes to learn how to read and write, and three times the wage they would receive “in line.” Join us every day December 1st through the 12th in Freeset’s Freedom Tour of 12 Days of Freedom with Freeset and become a part of the freedom story. Watch our video, shop our bags, change lives.
And then of course we got a cheese plate. It was three European cheeses, which our waiter thoroughly explained, served with baguette slices and plum chutney. My favorite was the goat's cheese Brie-type one, of which the name has completely left me despite all the goodness.
Then I thought of it when 2nd daughter was visiting the other day. I don’t know why I thought of it at that time. Another mystery. But I did think of it. And I decided to show it to 2nd daughter (even though I was afraid she might have me committed to an asylum post-haste).
And finally, this is a community idea. We stand even now as those who have already inherited the kingdom of light. We already share in that blessing and we stand together. We are strengthened. We are qualified. We share in the kingdom. Maybe it would be a good idea for the church, for the saints, to celebrate the community aspect of our faith more often. I don’t mean in a superficial, and merely Sunday morning, kind of way, but an always, everyday, praying, encouraging, suffering kind of way. The practice of Christian faith must come alive and stop being stagnant. We share in the Kingdom of Light. The Kingdom of light is visible not only to the world around us, but also to one another.
4. Pep talks
I also grabbed this Quad Swatch card from 2009 UD Ballpark Collection. I couldn't pass up a single card with jersey pieces from four great players from the same team that all helped the Red Sox win the Series in 2007. I don't really root for the Red Sox too much anymore, but I was still rooting for them in 2007 and I collect all four of these players, so I was happy with the find. Some of these quad patch cards have strange combinations of players, but this one makes a lot of sense.
“No you’re not!” At which point of course, my brother Terry is saying ‘come on let’s go, come on let’s go’ and starting towards the park.
Ironically, the Elder- all of the Elders in the village, really- is younger than Mesdan. He has not, of course, taken age as well as Mesdan, since he spent much more time training as a shaman rather than a witch. The Elder is nowhere near as old as Mesdan, and likely won’t live nearly as long, either.
an addendum: for those who have read O Fallen Angel: I am not Maggie
Chris Cowland, director of advanced powertrains at Chrysler Group LLC, offered some revealing figures. A conventional, gasoline-fueled internal combustion engine and transmission make up about 10% of the cost of a $30,000 car, or about $3,000, he said. Ford Chief ExecutiveAlan Mulally at a green-car forum in New York City last week said batteries for the electric Ford Focus cost $12,000 to $15,000 for a car that is priced at $39,200, about $15,000 more than a petroleum-fueled Focus.
We ate salmon!
and I'm so glad they were.
Colors: Full Color ( 4 Color Process), Black and White
59. Go to another Broadway Show
Shay’s breath caught at her image. She forced its release, then frowned. Wedding gowns were bad luck. She’d sworn she’d never wear another. If someone had told her yesterday she’d be wearing this thing today, she’d have said they were one straw short of a bale.
Weird, right? It's not necessarily the publication's audience. Just as a query letter is designed to snare the agent, a press release is meant to snare the journalist and get him to explore your story further. A press release is a huge billboard that says THERE'S A GREAT STORY HERE! and it lures all the news-hungry journalists over to see what's going on.
Hopefully…
A few weeks ago I was chatting with a Burmese friend who told me that the Tesco supermarkets here in Chiang Mai had no stock of Mama brand instant noodles. These noodles are – unfortunately (as they are overflowing with all manner of ‘non-food’ gunk, artificial flavourings, etc.) – a massively popular staple for many people in Thailand, and tend to come in three main taste options: hot (as in spicy) with shrimp and/or pork gunk; really-beyond-a-joke-insanely-hot, also with shrimp and/or pork gunk; and a vegetarian version that falls somewhere in-between the other two, in terms of hotness. My Burmese friend told me how she regularly does a big bulk buy of these noodles, then journeys to Chiang Dao where her mother and extended family live. Telling me of the Mama drought she seemed something close to frantic, peppering the conversation with wide bulging eyes and much shaking of the head. At the time I though that her distress was a tad disproportionate to the issue: I mean, stocks run low from time-to-time, and surely Tesco would have some new stock soon, or – Heaven forbid! – my Burmese friend could buy another brand of noodles just this once …
A few weeks later the photos had been printed. Remember those days when you had to wait ages to get the prints. (My dad would have loved the digital age, he passed away in 1983.) We had a friend visit and my dad was showing him the photos he took of me, he was quite proud of them. Our friend, John, said that he could take better photos and so a friendly rivalry began. I was the guinea pig. So John asked me to pose this way and that and smile. Now I had just been told that I had missed out on a place in Teachers' College and I didn't feel like smiling and posing for anybody but I did.
“Real nice,” Rayloth quipped, his smile genuine as they neared the main walkway to the elevated camp.
The gray sea and the long black land;
In several instances, Romney has taken positions that can be demagogued by the radical right:
* I read a recent Guardian piece about Science Fiction to celebrate the opening of the British Library’s science fiction exhibition Out of This World. Your two series, Mortal Engines, and the Larklight trilogy, seem to have a strong Steampunk / Science Fiction influence and I wondered if these were genres you enjoy reading?
It had everything going for it. Starting up in the game changing Season 5 of DS9, instantly thrusting viewers and fans into a different side of the Maquis conflict. Done, that’s all you had to do was show viewers this, we get to see something new, and yet are in familiar. However, this turns out not to be the case. The crew of Voyager is flung into the outer edges of the Galaxy, and what was a simple mission has now left them 75 years away from the nearest Starfleet outpost. The Maquis move in and help form a rag-tag band of survivors, out to fight the odds. And that’s where it ends. If any summary I just told you sounds good, that is where it ends. The series from this point gets a little bit convoluted and A LOT crazy. Instead of being a fight for survival, Voyager returned to the normal Star Trek plot, which is ADVENTURES IN SPACE (echo, echo, echo). Yes, Voyager turns right around and starts mingling with alien life forms. Only seldom do they ever ask them for help or information.
(why do we even bother to say that?)
But, as I am more and more coming to realize, I am a highly creative individual. This is part of what makes me such a great problem solver. It is so integral to who I am, that I wrote fiction (fantasy) for the entire period of my life that I was pursuing science, and continued into my college career as I embraced other studies that fit me more. I have often taken up hobbies that are creative — sewing, writing, singing, and so on.
With that being said, I have no...absolutely no...science background for my undergrad. My major was Marketing. I took Biology and Physical Science, but no Chemistry, Bio Chem, A&P, etc. So...that where I have to start. I've weighed my options about going back to school in the fall. It's going to be expensive. I'm going to have to pay for these classes myself. I'm STILL paying on student loans that I took out for undergrad.
Now all I can think about is washing off Joe the Bartender's lonely germs.
9/21 – Ft. Collins, CO – Aggie Theatre
Don't you just love an Oak Tree? One that gives lots of shade and is so nice to sit under during those hot summer days. This tree, as you can see, dwarfs our house and if you look real close you can see the branches are touching our roof. I just love this tree - but unfortunately its time has come to go.
We stopped by the tile shop and I pretty much knew immediately that this was "the one" when I saw it:
Mitchell: no worries
5. Top Cat
Although, this is not my favourite Aronofsky film, it comes closest to the best one, which is Requiem For A Dream.
Yet I cannot help but dwell even more on the treasures that flow from Christ. As we learn to value them according to the economy of God’s kingdom, we will be more apt to let go of our earthly trinkets that have no more ultimate value than Monopoly money or a toy from a McDonald’s Happy Meal. This was the “deal” Christ was offering to the rich young ruler. Give up your earthly treasures, follow Me, and I will give you treasures in heaven (Mark 10:21). What the believer needs to understand, which again is made clear in the answers above, is that this treasure is received in part now and in fullness in the consummation. At the moment of transaction, when we give up our earthly ways and idolatrous pursuits, we begin immediately enjoying heavenly treasure and will increasingly do so throughout eternity.
Silly question (although sort of fitting) but if you were an animal, what animal what you be (and why)?
Baby just wants us all to be surprised. I'm kind of glad
I was reading “Complete Nutrition: How To Live In Total Health” by Dr. Michael Sharon, the other night. This book truly helped me realize how important protein is to the body. I also learned you have to be eating a complete protein (meaning a protein containing all the amino acids) for your body to properly absorb and use the protein. Now this is easier for people that choose to eat meat and animal products, but is still possible for people on a plant based diet. We just need to be conscious of this when we choose meals to consume. Sometimes this can require taking supplements, but you should speak with a doctor first before deciding to do so.
I made a very, VERY, large amount of Whoopie Pies. Halve the recipe if you aren't very hungry, or if you're not sharing.
Contentment built around the TV listings whilst trapped in the game.
2 cups of bittersweet chocolate chips
Here’s some of what I got:
Framed out in heavy, organically sculpted, weathered solder, a fiery cross of leaded crystal catches and refracts an amazing amount of light - throwing a confetti of color in all directions. The rusty solder picks up the earthy tones in the earthy, yet ethereal patina within the paneled bottle and the flashes of iridescence within the patina nicely complement the refracted light of the crystals. A band of solder rings the base of the interesting bottle and further contributes to the existing juxtaposition of rustic and refined.
The South African Transport and Allied Workers Union (SATAWU), South Africa's main truckers' union, went on strike over wages at midday on Tuesday, and its officials said that contrary to reports, it had not reached a deal with employers.
Mark Morrisroe (1 gelatin silver, 1987)
As well as:
And the media won't. Because they have more interest in the shooter than in our troops -- despite their crocodile tears.
Past Conferences:
that you meet a young man who shows you the attention and affection you’re seeking, but
So off we went to Starbucks. I ordered my usual hazelnut latte, and he ordered his usual hot choco. He then picked the sofa seat, took out my iPad. Asked the barista for the password to the wifi, and he settled there while surfing the net.
It was Annie's choice and she wanted to go to the grocery store place so early out Wednesday and away we went!
Born April 29, 1970, Andre Kirk Agassi is a retired professional tennis player and former world no. 1. Considered by critics and fellow players to be one of the greatest tennis players of all time,he has been called the best service returner in the history of the game. His performances, along with his unorthodox apparel and attitude, have seen him cited as one of the most charismatic players in the history of the game, and credited for helping revive the popularity of tennis during the 1990s.
Dear Internets:
There were two honey bees in this flower but also a cucumber beetle! Can't kill the cucumber beetle without killing the honey bee so the beetle wins.
Here's a sobering statistic for you.
When I got to the hospital, I had never been to a hospital before for myself, I didn't know where to go: they sent me to Labor & Delivery, and I had to tell my husband to meet me there. I thought he would surely have a heart attack, telling him this kind of news over the phone, to meet his, barely six months pregnant wife in Labor & Delivery. Well, right then, they hooked me up to the monitors, and sure enough, I really was having contractions. But they didn't do anything for them this time, but this wouldn't be the first time or the last time this would happen, that I would get admitted to L&D for contractions. I would end up having to go to Labor & Delivery 15 MORE times until I delivered!!
New Orleans then hosts the Detroit Lions in a game scheduled for noon on Dec. 4, followed by a road matchup at the Tennessee Titans, Dec. 11. The Saints will then travel to Minnesota for a Dec. 18 game at the Vikings before closing the regular season against two straight NFC South opponents.
The last 17 weeks have been all about me. I have been feeling sorry for myself cuz I can’t run. I have been jealous of everyone running, training and racing. Everday I wake up and curse Dec 29 and wish I never went for that run.
When I see my ex which is not all that often. I see a man who has gained a lot of weight. Who struggles with smoking, doesn’t get enough sleep, does not exercise and eats horribly. I am told by my children that while he seems happy to be with his girlfriend in that they seem to get along just fine, their relationship is plagued with issues. My children don’t like her and her children don’t like him. Her children rule her roost so much so that it aggravates my ex who came from a very disciplined home. He has also lost two jobs in two years. One because he did not heed the warnings of his company to end the inappropriate relationship with this woman whom he managed as her boss. The second because he was not seen to be a valuable asset. He is struggling financially living in an inexpensive home owned by his father out in the middle of nowhere causing him to get up early and stay up late because of a hellish commute. He is not able to do a lot of fun things with his own children because money is so tight. He is behind on his alimony and child support payments. He has lost the admiration and respect he had from his own children and struggles to keep that relationship close. Now that my son has a job it will become even more strained because he will not have as much time to see his father.
Goldsmith
Volomir: Rémy, when would you say is the moment when you started to paint and sculpt miniatures seriously?
“Why is KLIA building a third runway when they don’t use dual mode on two runways? Heathrow has 60 million passengers
be sure to leave a comment!
Here’s a series that I’ve been long familiar with. Mobile Suit Gundam Wing was one of the Gundam installments of the 90s, and the first one I was actively aware of as an anime fan. This is, of course, thanks to Toonami. But Gundam series usually run pretty long — almost always in the area of 50 episodes, so chances of me actually seeing each episode as they aired were pretty slim back then. Inability to really follow the plot relegated the series to little more than ambient noise as I did other things, but a few key moments stuck with me. Fresh off the high of Mobile Suit Gundam 00, I decided to dive back into this relic from my highschool days.
The Thai authorities have not yet set a date, and aid organizations and the UNHCR are stating that repatriation must be strictly voluntary, that no one should be forced back across the border into Burma. The Thai and Burmese governments are in talks over the potential closing of the camps.
Hot Rod Circuit - Reality's Coming Through (Vagrant)
The New Year is bringing lots of changes for the boys and I.
While kids who go to large schools are predominantly socialized by their peers, many home-education children have broader experiences in society with more opportunities to be socialized by both younger and older people, says Knowles.
I, for one, believe Congress is more responsible for what happens with the economy (see Clinton v Gingrich), however, Presidents like to take credit, so lets give them the blame too.
The opposition of the loss of the livestock market has never been about nimbyism, people in and around Abergavenny have never been opposed to balanced well thought out development, merely the lack of it. The potentially profound implications of the redevelopment of Abergavenny and the livestock market is one of those cases where there was (and still is) a pressing need for the proposed development to be called in by the Welsh Government and its Ministers.
March 26 - May 8, 2011
Yours truly,
Tired and hungry he took out the last of the apples and saw how the slight brown spot has slowly darkened and spread. It had a distinct aroma that it reminded him of her. He took a bite into it and let the bittersweet juice drip from his parched lips. It even tastes like her, he thought.
Brooks: we are too obsessed with the law
I could start a countdown. I’m that close.
a funny thing happened on the way to the bahamas...
20Behold, I stand at the door, and knock: if any man hear my voice, and open the door, I will come in to him, and will sup with him, and he with me.
5. Moonjuice 06:34
It was only a short walk to a flattish fairly dry takeoff area and before too long the first pilots were off…
Healthy Hair Food No. 10: Carrots
O'er his uncertain shadow droops the day.
HUNTSVILLE, Texas – Anthony Bartee, slated to be put to death this evening, filed a civil rights lawsuit today against the Bexar County District Attorney in U.S. District Court in San Antonio, a spokesman for Texas Attorney General Greg Abbott said.
What I’d like to see is the original film be rescanned at 4K and a new master struck that fully represented the original film with the different color scheme and grain structure. Then a lossless presentation of the theatrical 5.1 mix, which could show off the innovative mix that would resemble the theatrical DTS experience. (That would have been amazing!)
Regarding food ways, I have to agree with Michael Pollan who advises others to "Eat real food. Not too much. Mostly plants." Simple enough? It's certainly manageable for me and it's where I've landed. No counting calories, nutrients, logging in foods, figuring percentages, or feeling guilty for eating one food over another. Just living with a lighter heart, lighter conscious, and more freedom.
1/2 teaspoon Worcestershire sauce
142 **1. “American Constitutionalism and the Virtue of Prudence: Philadelphia, Paris, Washington, Gettysburg.” Leo Paul S. de Alvarez, ed., Abraham Lincoln, The Gettysburg Address, and American Constitutionalism (Irving, Texas: University of Dallas Press, 1976), pp. 77-170. (A shorter version was printed in Loyola of Los Angeles Law Review, vol. 8, pp. 1-87 (Winter 1975).) With Laurence Berns, Glen E. Thurow, and Eva Brann. (Sources: Items D-V/5/1961, D-VII/4/1973, and D-III/3(B)/1863, below.) See Items D-IV/15/1975, D-IV/18(B)/1962, D-Fall/1965, and D-III/3(A)/1963, below. See, also, Item B-10, above, pp. 229-41, 325-50 (1992).)
years to come. The national cowherd is down to its lowest level since 1958, corn prices remain double to triple as high as they were in 2005, and feedlot numbers are rising because of high export demand. USDA announced placements for July were up over 56% for Texas and 76% higher in Oklahoma. These are huge numbers, and the outlook of high numbers will continue to increase for some time.
5. Adenoids - Masses of lymphoid tissue that are located at the very back of the nose that helps to fight air-borne bacteria when you are young. It shrinks as you grow and becomes completely useless when you are an adult.
the Revolution.
And this is the final answer to the question as to whether or not the dollar will crash:
But if this had happened in October or November it would be a different story. Occupy was only successfully evicted because it had in the meantime alienated itself from broad support. The state let ODS’ own weaknesses wear it down to the bone, then smashed the brittle remains.
The department’s spending in 2011, according to the agglomeration budget approved yesterday, will be 5.1 per cent higher than last year’s spending. That’s well above the 3.2 per cent rise in inflation that the Conference Board of Canada predicts for the Montreal area in the new year.
Lot's of stash on my card this week! First off this image from Bugaboo featuring a cute little boy catching bugs is colored with Copics and cut out using a Spellbinders Labels die. The paper is from some blog candy I recently won (go me!). And in the spirit of the Letter B, I added lots of brads: butterflies, bees, and ladybugs. The sky was sponged in using a cloud template with Bashful Blue ink.
Southwest Chicken Soup
Even the very imagination of the subtle nature of the atom and the depth and height of this gigantic cosmos’ gross form can only amaze us no end. As of now even the findings available as far as gross material nature of our planet is concerned are very little and hence it is clear that a lot more needs to be known in the realm of the atomic and chemical structure of other stars, planets, galaxies etc along with their climates, atmospheric conditions etc. The overall structure and conditions of each of these planets etc is vastly different. In order to unearth a few scientific discoveries and then make practical use of the same, many years of scientific research had to be executed. Hence the million dollar question asked is: What will be the total time taken and the amount of hard work required to unfold the mysteries of infinite stars, galaxies etc present in this infinite cosmos? Is it really possible for man’s limited intellect to unravel these mysteries in totality?
His new case manager came to meet us and do the the three month evaluation. He's on a new medical plan and this one has a Dr. that does house visits. A Dr. who make house calls, that's pretty cool. We didn't like the new Dr. he was seeing at the clinic, so we agreed to change. Because she is new to us, she's keeping everything else the same. I'm still his caregiver.
In case anyone out there's noticed I've been taking a much needed internet break. I've been putting priorities back into place what needs to be there instead of things like reading friends blogs, blogging & my addiction to fb (Hello, my name is Alysha..and I'm a fb junkie..) No, seriously; I really, really am. It's my worst offender.
* one of two $25 gift cards for Safety Tats
Lauri has lived for years in Botswana, where she is married to the nicest headmaster in the world, known to me and facebook as Mr K. Lauri is the author of no fewer than seventeen books, ranging from non fiction to adult novels and short stories, through younger people's stories and novels. She writes across a wide range - romance and crime fiction among others. A real power-house and an inspiration to me. Fiercely honest, focussed, and an incredibly hard working writer, utterly charming, feisty, great fun and tough as anything. A brilliant combination for a writer!
You know, I’m cool with it because not only do I have a sweet set up here, I also got a job.
legs braised in pinot noir, smoked breast, parsnip puree, swiss chard with a cherry port sauce
It had $138,054 in net assets left over.
In a separate bowl, microwave cream, milk, cocoa powder and sugar, on high power for a minute. Remove from oven, and whisk until cocoa is dissolved. Strain mixture through a fine-mesh sieve, into the melted chocolate, pressing with a rubber spatula to blend in any cocoa solids. Whisk again until smooth.
A: … spokesperson
The Magic Touch…Ambrielle is a fairy godmother and the supervising fairy godmothers are trying to strip her of her powers. She has twenty-four hours to prove she is worthy of being a fairy godmother by straightening out one messed up soul…Danny. His girlfriend just broke up with him and he’s stuck in a job he hates. She proceeds to pester him about Charlotte until he sends her flowers. Then she proceeds to cause little issues at work until he is fired for sexual harassment. She does find him a potential small business to buy which he seems to consider when she pops out of his life at the end of the day. This story really did nothing for me, left me feeling bleh. I felt Ambrielle was overstepping way too far.
First 3 yrs: 800 passes, 54.4% CMP, 2.4% TD, 3.9% INT, 9.2% sacks; 63.5 rating,
Have nothing to do with it, indeed.
I threw on some clothes, and let the kids know that if they got dressed and ready for school, that they could come to the airport with us! Then I'd just drive them back home to the bus stop. EVERYONE wanted to come. But I couldn't wake up Jake. Go figure on that one.... His loss, right?
After that review, it was no surprise that Ben was one of the winners of the round. Who was the other winner? Christian. From lowest to highest in just a few hours! Too bad you could say the opposite about two of the cooks in the bottom three.
Overnight the Asian markets were mostly higher: +0.5%. European markets were mostly higher as well: +0.2%. US index futures were lower overnight, and at 8:30 weekly Jobless claims were reported higher: 388K vs 386K. The market opened lower at SPX 1388, then started to rally. The SPX had closed at 1391 yeaterday. At 10:00 Pending home sales were reported higher: +4.1% vs -0.5%. The rally continued, with small pullbacks along the way, clearing the OEW 1386 pivot just past 1:00. At 2:00 the FED issued the following: http://www.federalreserve.gov/newsevents/press/other/20120426a.htm. Around 3:30 the SPX hit 1402, then pulled back to close at 1400.
1 bash
- Make sure that if you go out late at night to take a group of friends with you. It’s always safe to travel in larger groups.
Morello: What did he say?
Captain America (Chris Evans)- Let me just say that Captain America is my favorite. I saw his specific movie, and like I said before, aside from him, it sucked. Really badly. But especially in this movie, I appreciated my background knowledge of him. I understood why he was troubled, why he felt the way he did, and acted a certain way. That is good acting right there, my friends. But the reason he is my favorite also has to do with the way his character acts. I believe he is the most noble of all of them! Here is a little funny quote that I liked that also showed a lot about his character:
~Ellen DeGeneres
We know boys mature later than girls, but of more pressing concern is the rise of boys/males who don’t seem to be growing up.
8. Get A Short Nickname
In general we agree to what it shows.
1 inventory
St. Mark’s mysterious eve,
We will both be wearing socially responsible rings, as they are both antique family heirlooms from both sides of our families. I also love how the shared history symbolizes the merging of our families.
looking for stars and softly naming constellations.
P.S. After returning to it again this afternoon (don't you love the line about the clay pipe she hid in her cabinet?), I picked up the small blue card I had used as a bookmark. Turning it over, I realized that it answered every question I had about this poem, and a lot of other things: "Everything is OK just the way it is."
My kids were absolutley amazing in helping pack and unpack the house and surprised me by working until 5am the night before the show to make sure everything was half decent before we left. It was a lovely surprise to come down in the morning and find all I had to do was pack the car ready to leave!
The skirt, however, was something of a challenge. I bought too little fabric the first time I went to the shop and ended up getting the rest on Thursday evening.
Schadenfreude? Perhaps. But I’m gratified to see that my beer tastes are pretty much in line with most of the drinking public, especially when it comes to fermented orange juice concentrate. If I had to make one drunken prediction for 2010, I’d have to say that Dogfish Head will finally come out of the hallway and rejoin a classroom full of well behaved, if somewhat precocious kids. Face it; you can’t continue to fool people into buying 9, 10 and 12 dollar four packs of weird beer forever!
here it is all primed:
So, when you are at home most of the time, Emotional Eating only "works" if you have the food in the pantry. So if I can go to the Supermarket with a full belly and in a good state of mind, I generally come home with a lot less rubbish food.
Griffin had other ideas!
If I honestly feel that way? No, I'm just kidding about it, lady. I'm just acting all mad, but I really think pedophilia sounds fun. Let's all try it!
This particular woman is one of my least favorite contestants. She is portrayed as a rude and offensive person. She seems to be without morals. But in that moment, my heart went out to her. I realized she too longed to be loved. She needed to be encouraged. She was in a place she has never been before and was frightened. Being among strangers in a land that was unknown, she felt insecure. Haven’t we all been there?
Mandy Chang, 40, New York, N.Y.
It is a long time since I had had much luck browsing the charity shops, and my vinyl hunting focus has very much shifted to car boot sales lately. Having said that, very recently I have been getting a bit disillusioned with those as it seems there are more and more vinyl hunters around, and not much vinyl around in early season visits. So it was a pleasant surprise to score some good vinyl finds at my local charity shops in the last few days. It was strange, but almost all the shops I visited seemed to have some new stock, and a variety that I had not seen for a long time. Perhaps it’s the spring cleaning effect; or are the chazzas finally cottoning on that Mantovani and James Last just don’t shift; or is it the “vinyl revival” stories encouraging them to put more out front? It’s just coincidence I’m sure, and probably a flash in the pan too, but meantime I’m very happy.
All of this still feels so ridiculously backwards when I think about the person I USED to be, who WOULD (and could) push through everything, no matter what. I still tell most people to push, but only if they CAN. I personally don’t push because I know what it will get me. I’m not competitive, and in all honesty, I’m happy to still be able to fucking walk. So no, I won’t be pushing through something for the next hour or even the next 10 minutes, because it will make my next four weeks really difficult.
*I understand that I have done nothing perfectly nor ever will.
That's a cheap way to build suspense.
The financial mountain alone is huge. I'm working on a giveaway to help tear down the mountain. This post is getting long, so I'll share the giveaway this evening. In the meantime, if you have something you'd like to donate to the giveaway, please contact me and let me know. You can email me at mamarhodes@live.com.
However, the right of confrontation can be seen to possess two additional theoretical dimensions, both of which pertain to relational or extrinsic policy concerns. Firstly, the right to confrontation is underpinned by a wider societal dimension. Secondly, the right can be rationalised in terms of the promotion of the accused’s dignity and autonomy within the trial process.
At the age of 16, Judith met William Campbell, a minor contract player through her sister Jackie who had started a movie career under the name of Susan Morrow. They married when Judith turned 18 in 1952, but the marriage was over by 1958. Judith claimed in her autobiography that Campbell cheated on her repeatedly, which he denies. Whatever the case, Judith was footloose and fancy free and indulging in the single life that she felt that she had been denied by marrying so young. With an inheritance from her grandmother and her alimony, Judith was free to spend her days getting ready for her nights out on the town.
He did not participate in the least in what we call “mobility.” He died, after eighty-two years, in the same spot he was born in. He was probably in his sixties when he made the one longish trip of his life. He went with my father southward across Kentucky and into Tennessee. On their return, my father asked him what he thought of their journey. He replied: “Well, sir, I’ve looked with all the eyes I’ve got, and I wouldn’t trade the field behind my barn for every inch I’ve seen.”
You don't have to use a Phindy image in your project but if you do, please follow the instructions on the sidebar and enter your card twice. If you don't have any Phindy images, run right over to the store and pick a few up. There are a wide variety of images that would be suitable for a child's birthday at various ages from toddlers to teens. Just check out the Wee Babbies, Cute Kids and the Dads and Teens sections.
Men want more than one thing.
I was sixteen, tall, skinny and awkward; still trying to work out what clothes suited my gangliness, still wanting a style of my own. I wanted originality, but nothing too scary, something that would make people look, but not comment and never laugh; I wanted something more than Topshop but not quite punk.
1) Get some salt. Not a shaker, the bit Morton’s container. You’re gonna need to *pour* salt.
‘not quite sure,’ i said.
While we were at Lake Powell last month, we stopped at the Walmart in Page. I noticed that they had an entire case of green chiles for only $10.00! I bought one the night before we came home because I never ever seen them sold by the case up here, and they would certainly cost more than that.
He got a new job and she was glad; maybe now he´d move on and she´d be able to divorce him without too much fuss. But one night he took out his rifle to clean it and the look in his eyes told her there´d be fuss.
Completion of Warzones will gain a large increase in the percentage of rewards it represents, so while scoring is still the primary driver, you will cease to see games that give no rewards if players have a minimum of 1 medal earned. We are extending the time we wait for a full team of eight to better make sure Warzones pop with complete teams.
To understand fully that you are totally capable of TFI (True Financial Independence) you must move within yourself a firm confirmation of KNOWING you are ONE with the whole of the Universe. ONE with the Universal Substance from which ALL things come, including money. You have the very POWER resident within you to move the mountain of debt and financial crisis by simply aligning yourself with your natural state of affluence. Your free flow of the very abundance that you are.
Now, in case you're wondering what this has to do with my bucket list, let me tell you. #61 was to have friends to go with on a vacation. I couldn't think of a better couple to be with. I realized this was on the list when were on our way there, and quickly text Suzy my thoughts and realized how blessed I was to have them in our lives. Here are just a few pictures of our weekend:
Why should your child be recognized as “Preemie of the Year”?
Fall comes to subtly to Southern California. Summer lingers as long as possible, however, come September, our days are warm but the mornings and evenings have a nice chill to the air. While we enjoyed quick bowls of cereal and ice cold smoothies for breakfast during the summer, it is time to shift to warm, hearty fall breakfasts.
My suggested Phase II
Hi everyone, I'm super excited to be this week's guest blogger. The following images made me want to go on a road trip. Hope you enjoy them as much as I did. I am also adding a few links where you can find some interesting "quilt trails" across rural America.
The little boy who scowled behind that mean window was somewhere around her age. Morgan would never be sure whether it was the words or the hate in those eyes (that she would have done anything to see friendship in instead) that stabbed more painfully. All she now or ever would know was that the sting both caused made tears well in her little golden eyes. Not tears enough to haze her vision when she turned her head away and saw another window’s worth of lashing out at her freedom. HCTIB EITTUO
06 Mar 2012: Fire in Tembeissoukat pasture land, the second within a 5km radius in less than a week and the fourth in recent months, raising suspicions of deliberate sabotage of animal grazing among locals. These episodes coincided with the “Hope 2012″ program to alleviate food and animal feed shortages.
Create the tell,
I was reading this post about having a DNS -- do not start -- day. It's one thing to have one DNS, but another to have multiple.
Better.
For home service make sure that the Duncan electrician should be called for professional opinion and repair to ensure the high quality service and safety of our household and office buildings.
The end result here is "Stand Up", a raucous, slappin' melding of personalities and hardcore stylings.. enjoy!
Also “cruelly hacked” was Santina, the prophet’s wife and Jeanne (eight years old) Angelia (nine) Margaret (ten) and the three-year old son Mario. One account puts Mario’s age at eighteen months. In addition to the prophet’s head, one of the girl’s arms was severed. Police suspected that wound was the result of a “miscalculated blow” intended for Santina’s neck, as it too had been hacked but the head was left hanging by a thread. Leaving the house on St. Aubin avenue, in the Italian district of depression era Detroit, the fiend and pervert left a bloody trail for police which went nowhere.
Shines in glory through the night.
But I knew my friends would be -insert wicked grin- so I chose, rather unwisely, I might add (but, hey, I was only 9) to share this nugget in whispered exchanges with a few rapt madrassah classmates. Girls, naturally! What do you take me for?
He says "I'd like to continue boarding for zones..... one..... aaaaand........ two."
Zeus, what in the name of hockey sticks, soured molasses, and one six-year-old are you playing at? What kind of a signs are these? It almost feels as if me on the internets is no longer working for you? Or is this just payback for the disappearance? What?
“These two individuals are now where they belong and should be in jail for the rest of their lives,” the Rev. Frank Pavone, national director of Priests for Life, said in a statement. “Even those who believe abortion should be legal can join with us to stop the out-of-control practices of people like Brigham and Riley.”
By adding that copyright message, you're making everyone uncomfortable about doing the very thing you WANT them to do: share and discuss your work!
I am also organising the Soc of Authors in Scotland AGM and Summer Party. (I think I may have said that already.) This is a feat of extreme difficulty, most of which no one will ever know about unless I drink a bit too much HP in the Yurt. I have 100ish members coming, each of whom has to be herded, catlike. They are all published authors but many of them can't read. I have emailed them all asking for various bits of information and many of them have not replied; many others have sent the wrong information to the wrong place; and many others have given me far too much information. Bless them. I asked for volunteers to help at the party and so many of them were wonderfully forthcoming. HOWEVER, this now means that I am boggled by a spreadsheet telling me how many people can help early but not late and have bad backs, or can help late but not early and can't stand for long, and how many have no bad back at all but have to take their mother-in-law to the station so can only arrive at 10.55, and how many really want to help by handing round food but would accept being asked to fill goody bags but only early and not late, and how many ... Yes, you're getting my drift.
Pop on over to our main CMC blog for all of the details of our latest challenge and join in the fun! Don’t forget you’re not just restricted to Copic markers, you can also use ProMarkers, other alcohol markers or Coloured Pencils!! Pop by the rest of the DT girls below to see what they’ve created;
A young girl wanted to bring a gift but she was the poorest peasant.
4. Lauren Jackson – Seattle Storm
One of the reasons I had started a Twitter account was to use it as an extension of my blog. The blog stood still for some time, but my Twitter life suddenly opened up a whole new avenue for me. I started with very few "friends" and was total #fail with learning how to navigate around the site. I had made my first new friend within the first few weeks (someone who I am still lucky enough to call my friend to this day) and she became not only my go-to girl about the Twitter lingo, but being a new user herself, also learned to navigate this new world of possible connections with me. We've since met and cultivated relationships that I can honestly consider some of the best friendships I've ever made.
Instead, they went on to win the Independent Bookseller of the Year award and now have a thriving business which is an object lesson in how to run a bookshop in the age of Amazon and ebooks. It just shows how much I know.
Purple Paisley Palazzo Loving Mother
(Modern European History degree) In My Draws
Papers: Bazill- kraft and white cardstock,
Just a few of the helpful macaron making tidbits that I picked up:
Some of you may have decided opinions on Ugg boots, and you wouldn’t be the first. When I left for Australia, I hated Uggs, and was determined to never buy a pair. But that was before I learned a bit more about them, and how they’re a part of Aussie culture. My experience with them was that they were an American fad, one that I wished would die out. I’m not even talking about how they don’t really give your feet any support, but seeing pictures of movie stars and regular people wandering around in Uggs of all colors. Well, you can imagine that I was somewhat revolted. I’m not a fad follower, and wasn’t going to become one.
Far be it from me to accuse Nancy and Alice of being anything other than entirely scrupulous with the truth, but apart from them, and the lady called Fukino from Hawaii, it really was not necessary for many people to know the facts or be involved in hiding them.
Finally, we can diversity the basis of middle-class employment. As has already been discussed, the middle-class has focused itself almost entirely on college-trained professional occupations despite stagnant demand and ever-expanding supply. There are alternatives. One obvious one would be to take some of the 17% of saved income and start their children out in small businesses if a professional salary isn’t forthcoming. Another would be to look to the skilled trades. As CNN points out, there are still skilled blue collar factory positions that pay solid middle class wages and few takers. A presidential initiative to invest in and raise the prestige of technical colleges and apprenticeship programs – along the lines of Germany’s successful Berufsausbildungsgesetz (vocational training program), which has resulted in 51% of German youth completing an industrial apprenticeship in 2001 – could rebuild a section of the middle class that flowered when the union movement was in full bloom.
Still, as long as it looks good on paper who are we to complain.
Now, obviously, there are situations in which polyhedrals simply aren't realistic, but Gamer Dice doesn't do much to make me want to use it. The app's base configuration is a flat, matte gray. While its interface is functional, it has no visual appeal and no ability to simply input a number--rather, you have to tap the plus or minus button numerous times. While this isn't a problem with small dice pools, rolling 5d12+22 would take a huge amount of time. Plus, Gamer Dice doesn't allow for rolling of multiple types of dice simultaneously, which means that games like Marvel Heroic Roleplaying aren't playable with this app.
A night of excitement with the two hottest men on the planet? Yeah, baby! Yet Kaz’s inborn ability to read auras tells her something isn’t right. It’s obvious Seth and Luke are madly in love, but subtle clues in Luke’s aura signal he’s up to something. She’s not sure what, but if she doesn’t do something quick, the two men she’s quickly come to adore will wind up without the happily ever after they both deserve.
Cardigan: Walmart
We hope this has been a helpful guide to you as you figure out your dining itinerary (doesn't everyone do that before they travel?). As always, if you have specific questions about where to eat please feel free to email us - we're happy to help and we really love doing it. We'll probably ask you a few questions about your budget, location within the city, if you have transportation, and what kind of cuisine you are looking for, so including that in your email isn't a bad idea.
Malcolm Hardee judge Kate Copstick and I were totally taken in. We did not realise we had been conned until we were told by Bob immediately before the Malcolm Hardee Awards Show last night.
This special publication is intended to inform readers of the necessity for new Public Procurement legislation in our country and to set out the objectives of our proposals.
Right now I think that I'll always remember the moonlit walk along the beach. When we escaped, drove north after she fought with her husband, the editor, said she was leaving him.
The second reason is one no one talks about. This is due largely to a fact that thanks to science, most people (even Christians) no longer treat the spiritual real, vital, and effecting our world. People often ascribe the death penalty to a human need of vengeance against those that hurt our loved ones. They disregard the fact that human vengeance often enough was as much about getting vengeance for the dead so the dead wouldn’t take their vengeance upon the living (especially their relatives who had failed to get them justice). It was believed, pretty much universally, that those who died violently, and were not appeased with the death of their murderer, would curse the land and their families with their rage.
I know a girl who
Russet Potatoes- 2
Location: South Bend, IN
I did add more garlic than the one small clove that was recommended and played it by ear on the hot sauce. I was using Sriracha Hot Chili Sauce..it was what I had on hand...and had no idea hot it was compared to what she used. And then with the pepper jack cheese...well, I added about a teaspoon or two of hot sauce as I made it and added more at the end to taste.
Since I've been super busy lately entering my last two weeks of classes, followed by two weeks of finals...I just have not been updating. At all. That being said, I was wondering if maybe ya'll would be interested in helping me out on keeping this blog going & writing some guest posts for me!
…CNTRL/NRN PLAINS SEWD INTO THE MID MS AND OH VALLEYS…
“That’s a commonplace claim.”
It seems certain that in the sixth century, and quite likely into the early parts of the seventh century, people in the main Romanized areas could still largely understand the biblical and liturgical texts and the commentaries (of greater or lesser simplicity) that formed part of the rites and of religious practice, and that even later, throughout the seventh century, saints’ lives written in Latin could be read aloud to the congregations with an expectation that they would be understood. We can also deduce however, that in Gaul, from the central part of the eighth century onwards, many people, including several of the clerics, were not able to understand even the most straightforward religious texts.
On top of the exclamations of joy which make up the majority of the thread, here are a few quotes:
You hear that? Nope, me neither...that's called silence!
To my knowledge, not at all. Frasier was created by the Charles Brothers to serve as a temporary love interest for Diane. Who would Diane Chambers be attracted to and why? Those were the only considerations.
Now that a couple mental myths have been covered, this brings me to:
Paranormal romance is a genre with infinite possibilities. Yet we seem to see the same situations and ideas played over and over again. I've heard a lot that the market is over-saturated, but it is still doing good business. Publishers are looking for original ideas. If you're writing a new book, here's a few tips on what to avoid.
C: … nature.
From Summer’s Lease by John Mortimer
AD/HD AND THE BRAIN. A particular area of the brain works much harder in children with AD/HD. The area in question is the dorsal anterior cingulate cortex. The reporting scientists concluded that "This fundamental difference in brain function might be an underlying cause of the inattentiveness, impulsivity and focus problems that make
Did you hold a successful blood drive in 2011? Please share your success stories.
So thrilled to welcome back the charming pair of Love + Lavender, Aileen and Ellen, who have been guest posting every Thursday this month here on Classic Bride. Today the girls will be sharing one last pretty board with us - all about hydrangeas ... my favorite! Let's swoon together ... :
If you are an unbeliever you should come to Christ, you should want to come to Christ. If you are a believer you should want unbelievers come to Christ, you should share the Gospel with unbelievers and we should believe in Christ ourselves. Jesus is our savior and we should help to lead little lost sheep to the shepherd. Even though sin says that it is delicious green grass (in other words it looks desirable) but really it is a thorn-bush. We should come to Jesus and help others come to Jesus.
Anyhow, and after way, way, way too much introduction, Felix the Cat:
Ultimately, she is still using the same system, but now it has style AND functionality!
- Macaroni cheese - can be half cooked then frozen, then popped in the oven to finish and crisp up
Would sticking to her principles make her happy, if indeed the embryo was some kind of living being? If she decided against the abortion, there would be a heavy and catastrophic fall out.
But since I've stopped the routine I had going in February and March, I started noticing that the bugs in my head were returning. It didn't take long for me to realize why from a very practical perspective.
Two Brothers Brewing Company
The band of gold I'd always dreamed I'd wear.
Skepoet: What are the greater challenges you see for scholarship in your tradition?
Daniel doesn't talk, but man can that boy play. His favorite toys when he was a tiny kid were anything with lights and music. He had a little jukebox that played tunes and lit up when he spun the roller in the middle. He wore the color off the plastic making that thing go!
Barclay Penthouse
Firstly the Sharon fruit is not easy on the eye. Looking like an unripe Tomato with a peculiar growth sprouting up from the top it has an unappetising aura. However, in the true spirit of livewithfruit we must never judge a book by its cover. Unfortunately sometimes we should. The taste is underwhelming to say the least. Mildly sweet and lacking a fullness or body, the Sharon fruit falls flat. Livewithfruit had to buy a four pack of these and is feeling something of a Plum for doing so.
Love is no more
Here is the random/Accessories I've got.
If you happen to have an unlimited budget, “There is an app for that.”
- Ommegang Art of Darkness
“We’re excited that Demetrius has chosen to finish his college football career here at UNA,” Bowden said. “He comes with the highest recommendations from every coach I had the opportunity to talk to at Alabama in regards to his character, football playing ability and work ethic.”
To avoid Fermented grapes "until the days be fulfilled, in the which he separateth himself unto the LORD, he shall be holy,"
Jesus, who has just cleared the temple of the money-changers and sellers, is challenged to prove his authority to take such action. How does Jesus avoid answering the question directly? Why can’t the chief priests and elders answer Jesus’ counter-question? What motive has Jesus exposed? Why is it that the tax-collectors and prostitutes are entering the kingdom of heaven ahead of the chief priests and elders?
When Sam and I saw these at Christmas, we both remarked, "Hey- we can make these!" And so I did.
I was going to make it top 10, but I couldn't come up with 10 things I like about this town. Gee, I wonder why I'm moving.
When Chase wins an all-expense-paid tour of Entropia for himself and one of his foreign pen pals, welder Natalie Machackova is not his first choice, or even his last. Shadowed by an indefensibly enthusiastic Tourist Board, they travel through a dysfunctional, balkanized Entropia that reveals itself, one horrid town after another. In Stamphenge, Chase spots a rare stamp that once belonged to his grandmother. Convinced he triggered her death by using her most valuable stamp to send away for other stamps as a child, he steals it back. But when he learns the stamp's owner has died that very night, Chase fears he has killed again.
While NYCCGC had originally been involved with the drafting of the new rules, negotiations eventually broke off, leaving the Coalition and its allies frustrated. On the morning of August 10, NYCCGC rallied supporters, helping fill Parks’ public hearing regarding the rules to overflow capacity. Over 300 garden devotees shared their passion as well as their consternation at the then-proposed rules, ultimately having a positive impact on the recently published rules.
I believe most practitioners can benefit greatly from the book's section "The Examiner Misconstrued a Claim Limitation." I've said countless times on my blog that most rejections aren't really about what the reference teaches, but are instead based on a misunderstanding about claim construction. Yet from the file histories I read weekly in doing research for my blog, practitioners don't always get this. You should be arguing "The Examiner has misconstrued the claims" and this book gives you some boilerplate with which to do just this.
Sirocco top and skirt, op shopped
3. "My Own Life"
This is the first year I grew Sugar Snap Peas … these are the peas that you eat the entire shell and they are delicious! Snipping them fresh from the vine they are Awesome! We did cook up a stir fry with these garden glories and brought in another bunch just today for another meal. Not sure how many more batches we will harvest but there is the option to freeze these peas since they do freeze well.
While many of us continue to dream of being picked up by the ‘majors’, while we’re waiting, there is no harm whatsoever in self-publishing a few e-books.
Then I heard those voices again, but this time I reacted differently.
The FATF President will visit Turkey on May 22 to discuss the issue with Ergin and Finance Minister Mehmet Şimşek, the Hürriyet Daily News has learned.
Then, he started naming 90′s act.
And I had heard of the rumblings before. Stories of how farmers, fearing lack of sufficient water to irrigate their fields, their fears stoked further by politicians not beyond making their political opponents squirm in their seats whatever the consequences, had eventually agitated successfully for shutting off the water, leaving the thousands of migratory birds headed for Bharatpur in dire straits. And it showed in the countryside as we rode along.
It’s the tasting. And, the unfortunate truth is that taste buds are evil, vindictive, cruel, needy, greedy, and addicted youths in revolt.”
"Once again the impression is left (by the police) that ordinary crime was the only motive for barbaric murders.
let loose the horse
Why doesn't he quit the Labor Party and run as an independent? Or maybe he can start a new party?
Everything I know is a synthesis of experience (good and bad), both mine and peers as related to me. Which is a problem of itself. When we grope for understanding based on what our buddies tell us, dating life can easily slip into some odd movie combination of American Pie and American Psycho. Finding the path that's right for each of us as individuals requires a lot of going it alone. No way around it.
The Gold Care section underlines how important it is not to wear gold jewellery in swimming pools; so please make sure that any little Molly Brown fans carefully remove any jewellery before jumping in and store their necklaces and bracelets in a safe place.
I’ll let my fingers
Heather from out of order records finished these buttons for RFK and McClellan in record time...arrived today, they look great, I'm going to make sure to send her a link to the project. Plus she sent a 7" for review on 7inches.blogspot...So art and 7"'s go together after all.
Here are the comics I created. As you can probably see from my work, I got more experienced with the site and its features as I went along.
Among my friends who're waiting at the base,
I feel like this is the beginning,
My hands are folded, my head is bowed.
To save when shopping online it is well established that you should (1) run a quick search for coupons and (2) shop through an online portal if you can. But until recently, if you were buying anything on Amazon, there was no way to double-dip. You could of course get points/miles through your credit card, but there wasn’t any portal offering points/miles or cash back for Amazon purchases. This changed very recently: now, US Airways’ Shopping Mall now gives 1 mile per $1 spent on amazon.com and Hawaiian Airlines’ eMarket gives 2 miles per $1 spent!
Bake for 25-30 minutes and remove from oven. Let cool on the counter for 20 minutes before removing the muffins from the tins/forms. Once cooled, remove the muffins and set them on a cooling rack. Serve and enjoy!
I always have a good measure of skepticism towards these things not because I'm afraid of having my heart broken or anything like that, I mean, your heart can get broken by someone there was not ever a chance of anything beyond sex after midnight and home before dawn; so that's not the point. I'm skeptical because you can't predict what's going to happen, and even though there are ways of guiding you life the way you want it to go, I'd say half of it was still due to chance and fate.
Last year, Obama promised to veto the draconian FY 2012 National Defense Authorization Act. It authorizes detaining US citizens indefinitely without charge or trial based solely on suspicions, baseless allegations or none at all. US military personnel are now authorized to arrest and indefinitely detain anyone globally, including US citizens. Due process, civil protections, and judicial fairness are null and void. Presidents may order anyone arrested and imprisoned for life without charge or trial. Abuse of power has replaced rule of law protections.
And wonder how you built it all,
DW: Now that’s an incredible statement you’re making. You’re saying 57 different countries, including some of these Eastern European countries…
- Add in the fermented soybean paste and the sweet soybean paste and let it boil.
as a big surprise
16. I'm No Scaredy Cat - Lou Rawls
Diseases of the arteries and veins are referred to as cardiovascular diseases. These diseases are caused due to the thickening of the blood vessels due to deposition of plaque that impairs blood supply to heart. As one grows old, fats get deposited on the walls of the blood vessels. These fatty substances produce certain chemicals that make the walls of the blood vessels sticky, that in turn attract substances like proteins and inflammatory cells traveling through the blood. All these substances combine to form a material called plaque that thickens the walls of the blood vessels. This condition is known as artherosclerosis, and believed to be the number one killer in America. Improper blood supply to the heart may result in chest pain and a heart attack. Coronary heart disease refers to the astherosclerosis of the coronary arteries that supply oxygen-rich blood to the heart.
What does it mean to settle? When you choose to make a change, knowledge is important to make an informed decision. Making a wise choice is dependent on one’s knowledge coupled with understanding. We come to God through the Blood of Jesus Christ but have no idea what the benefits of a believer are. We have not because we ask not, but who would go to a perfect stranger making demands? Everything changed when you came to know Jesus Christ as Lord and Savior. The potential of your life changed and is no longer subject to the confines of this life unless you choose to remain in your past and retain residency to this world. God has granted you access to His Kingdom and every single benefit not then, but now. Where are you today? If you have settled, I encourage you to step out of mediocrity to the miraculous. Stop accepting less than God’s Best and claim all the Promises of God He holds in His Hand just for you. I set out to know and understand what it means to settle by simple definite and here is what I found:
Bring a pot of water to boil and blanch the pasta sheets. Even if they tell you there's no need to pre-cook them, I'd still do it because the taste of raw pasta is not fabulous.
Andrew handled the change in feeding well this time (when they moved the tube last week he was spitting/throwing up and was so constipated that he couldn't move anything through his system). He finally worked out his constipation issues, and is back to "normal" now - including a few blowouts! We took advantage of the fine nursing staff to handle those!
Me: ‘Oh, really? What happened?’ (I’m not expecting much, but…)
Maybe a little too much. :(
I loved, loved loved seeing Linden get all giddy over Jack. It turned right creepy when she saw the pic on the fridge, though. Have we seen that pic before? I feel like I should know where it came from, or who drew it – something. Very cute how they showed up at Holder’s door (“Are you home?”), but either they were followed and Linden didn’t notice, or someone is watching Holder place – or both of them. Freaky ending.
This is real meditation. As a monk once said to me, everyone is all always meditating, the trick is to stop.
But what happens when you reach a certain age? All the sins of your past assemble in a single spot and assault you at once. It was once possible for me to breeze through life no matter what was thrown up with no other help than a nose-peg and cunning intelligence. Now, laxity is itself the problem.
At the fabulous Silk Route, we have a delicious dinner of Vegetable Pot Sticker Dumplings, Paw Pia Pak (Vegetable spring rolls), Pad Thai and other delectable vegetable Thai dishes. After dinner, we go back to our room, where Alex and I settle in for the night. Adam has made other plans to go back to the Intercontinental with Christian and his friends. He has had a taste of the bar scene, and now I guess he’s hooked!!
How cool is that! Why don't you click on the preview below, which will take you to the post I've been featured in, along with some other crafters. My post is at the bottom. Be sure and look around while you are there! I'm sure you will find something you like!
Out by the barn
My biggest complaint about this game is the lack of puzzle solving the Tales games usually have when traversing dungeons. Their are some problem solving activities, but they are easy compared to other RPG games.
To be honest, I'm not sure what to expect from this event which will supposedly mix multi-lingual poetry with music and video, but with poets from China, France, Colombia and the United States and an entrance price of just €2 (which also includes a drink!) it must be worth a look.
They’re like deer in the headlights, completely surprised by what happened.
did james really mean what he said or did it come out wrong?
8 Core Beliefs of Extraordinary Bosses
So i bet you wondering what these prizes are going to be..... Yes.
Stats
The Chopra Center offers different 21 day meditations. And this one seemed really interesting. It is the 2011 winter 21 day meditation, and I am just starting today. So I wanted to share this link with you. This is a quote from the page: "The 21-day Meditation Challenge starts with small steps and gently progresses to longer meditations, then eases back down. We will explore many different types of meditation along the way. The optimum length and frequency for a meditation practice is 30 minutes, twice each day, but we’ll begin with a few minutes at first and work our way up to more extended meditations."
We had lots of lovely entries last time, I hope lots of you will join in this time too.
1. Say Valley Maker (5:34)
and regulations, as are, or shall be, established for the government of the said Army."
When breaking down the messages to match with the popular political and social terms, the research team found that 212,583 out of 1.3 million checked messages, roughly 16 percent, had been deleted by the Chinese government. And 54 percent of all messages sent from Tibet had been deleted.
As I mentioned in my last post, I had recently purchased two vintage items one of the being a long wool pencil skirt. Well today I wore it to work and must say it performed ab-fab! Sooooo comfy and kept me as snug as a bug in a rug! Actually everything I wore today was for the first time!
I’ve had a lot of time to think and consider things as I’ve been on my ass recovering. There are things that I’ve decided, and things that I have planned, and I want to share them all here so we’re on the same page as I (we) move forward.
Miss Moussie stared at the Dutchess, and raised one eyebrow..like she always does when she worries or finds things to be suspicious..!
Anyway, the band, who were a mix of Very big, very small, and very tricological dudes. Their style was a kind of black metal meets old school death metal, with the vocalist panting a kind of rasp into the mic. Whilst the black metal element didn’t really push my buttons, the death metal bits were very nice, reminding me of early Immolation. Slow, depressing and a shit ton of heavy. 3 fists.
- Bite of BBQ Rib
They will be starting on March 6th! Thanks again to everyone who entered, all the entries were great!!! I wish I had room for everyone :(
The summer semester is only five weeks long, so if his behavior doesn't change at least I will only have to endure it for a short time (Littles is signed up for the Fall semester too, Boog is back in preschool and is not). But my real hope is that he grows to enjoy it (the actual class, because he enjoyed himself today...by running around) and learn some of the songs. Fingers crossed!
While the park's main draw is it's namesake active volcano, our tour also included visits to two of its other unique natural attractions. On the first day we stopped at an overlook of a deep valley where Colombia's only population of condors habitually exist. Condors apparently mate for life, can live up to sixty years, and only lay one egg every two years - a few reasons condors in many parts of the world are endangered. The park workers set out raw meat on a rock outcropping to tempt the enormous birds from the sky, which eventually worked, but only after vultures came and tried to take their food. Vultures, not small birds themselves, looked like little crows next to the majestic condors when they descended to claim the baited meat.
Have you ever wondered why we yawn? Yes, we yawn when we’re bored, sleepy or tired, but what purpose does a yawn serve? How are yawns triggered? And were you aware of the fact that in humans, there is a relationship between yawning and orgasm? Heh, thought that would get your attention.
Naomi ends up climbing out the window and tells Annie she’s going to wear “the dress” tomorrow when she sees PJ. Jen, of course, overhears the conversation. Naomi goes to the music festival and finds out Jen switched “the dress” with a clown outfit. Jen shows up in “the dress” just in time for PJ to show up. PJ soon excuses himself, as he has a emergency call about his vineyard (as one does). Jen and Naomi later argue, again, and accidentally fall into a mud pit, which they then wrestle in. Someone random knocks Annie in too, so she yells that PJ left for Napa an hour ago to Naomi and Jen. Naomi and Jen then apologize to each other and say they’re jealous of each other. Jen then tells Naomi that she’s leaving for LA with Jacques. Annie later hands Naomi a letter that Jen left. The letter says that she’s going to Napa, which leads Naomi to think that Jen’s following PJ.
As per the code, the state government cannot announce new programmes and policies or lay foundation stones for projects. It cannot undertake any activity that can be interpreted as an attempt to influence the voter.
I can’t pronounce it, but I can darned sure drink it!
Another reason that I am nervous wreck by the time we get to the beach? All the mess you have to take and how dirty it gets. Case in point...
Then as quietness once more settles down on the earth,
Due to increased commercial activities, real estate brokers charge high fees for property buying in urban towns and cities because of the oklahoma history topics is truly unique. It has a subtropical climate and is covered by forests and wildlife sanctuaries. Whether one is searching for a mainstage summer season consisting of classic musical favorites along with the mangum oklahoma history atop the OKC Oil Field.
Have you been wondering how i came up with the name "Olive Roses"? Well i've named it after both of my gorgeous children - they are the centre of most of my scrapbooking these days, so it seemed only natural!!! My son's middle name is Oliver and my daughter's middle name is Rosalie, so Olive Roses was created!!
Judge Neels Claassen ruled in the South Gauteng High Court that there had been widespread manipulation of news under the SABC’s former head of news, Snuki Zikalala, and that Mr Zikalala had "dishonestly tried to cover up this manipulation".
A few weeks ago I came across a bag of fabric scraps at my local thrift store. I really couldn’t tell what was in the bag because it was all squished together and I couldn’t open it. It looked nice from the outside though and I ended up buying the bag (and with a 20% off coupon) for only a buck! This is what the bag contained:
Welp, that's it for now!! *^_^*
Blather, rinse, repeat, usually over the span of 45 minutes, and you'll have an inkling of what I do to keep myself gathering dust in the ersatz "Cult Movies" section of the local Fry's Electronics while everyone buys the latest repackaging of THE PRINCESS BRIDE. Yes, it is true that much like the original pressing of "You And I And George", the DVD release of NIGHT OF THE DRIBBLER featuring my commentary on it sold exactly 2 copies: I bought one, and The Dribbler bought one -- Where were you? Did I mention that I take my pension in loneliness and alcohol free DVDs and no actual money? But nonetheless, I continue with this special kind of movie mishegoss, because, well, what is the alternative? NOT getting to be immortalized for 90 minutes? History may have taught us nothing, and there's plenty of those nothing-taught fellows out there who would gladly do my job for the same not-pay, so I'd rather be the fool who at least knows what he's talking about when someone's magnum opus gets its one go-round in the digital realm.
The men left the scene after believing the two women were dead, but the women were able to get up and run to houses nearby to get help. Adams and Cobb were arrested a few hours later in Jacksonville, about 25 miles to the north.
The world is all different and relative, but it’s that difference that helps us see how unique and equally interesting we all are. I’ve learned so much about my character and individuality by picturing myself in relationship to other people from around the world.
In the s’lokas below from the Bhagavad Gita, the same sentiment and phrase is repeated.
Please pray the Lord will use those in authority to protect Christians in Egypt.
Our Next Guest Designers are (we have 2 this week)
Then, this new blog starts to follow me and it has a bunch of other advice on how to lose weight. It’s an interesting coincidence. I will say that the blog says absolutely nothing that I didn’t already know (I am so knowledgable, but perhaps poorly informed, about healthy eating and exercise that I can accurately tell you why any good food is healthy for you and any bad food is unhealthy for you while taking into account any conditions you may have…one of the the reasons why I am a hypochondriac is that I know too much about everything health related from food to exercise to drugs to herbs to…anything).
Out and About. Fall is definitely here. We have gone from 100% humidity to 0% almost overnight. Our bodies are trying to figure out what happen so we are all like alligators and lotion constantly. The smog has been pretty bad these last couple of weeks. Something in the air has been giving us headaches like nothing I have ever experienced before. We having been trying to take advantage of the cooler weather none the less. We all marched in the Columbus Day parade Saturday morning and then hiked up to Seoul Tower to have a great view of the Seoul International Firework Festival that night. Sunday we went on a tour of Incheon Landing where MacArthur came ashore during the Korean War. We are making an effort to get out and about; especially looking for things we can do outside before it gets too cold. Come late November it starts being miserably cold and all outside activities come to a halt.
In a way, one of the books cited in the following short list unwittingly demonstrates this very risk; Climate Wars: The Fight for Survival as the World Overheats would certainly work to stimulate a morally animated conversation with your friends over coffee or drinks, but there is something about its militarized fantasies of Arctic tent cities and Asian governments collapsing in civil free-fall that can't help but come across as over-excitable, opening the door to disbelief for cynics and providing ammunition for extreme political views.
For our sake he was crucified under Pontius Pilate,
In other news, we must have gotten a pretty fierce wind the night of the 6th. Not only were both of the low tunnel poly covers blown off but there was lots of unfastened farm supply strewn about. Most disconcerting was the farm stand which appeared to have been blown over backwards. Fortunately it sustained only minor damage; a cracked cedar post; a portion of its tin roofing bent. And, best of all, the newly constructed high tunnel was unfazed. Now I can hope for the other big test: a big dump of wet snow. Don't tell any of my co-islanders I said that.
#97- Waste Not
My excuse was of course, unlike a PAP, I was fourteen. I had a lot of distractions that I didn’t enter into willingly, like being confronted with a dumbing down culture everywhere I went, like feeling under the constant onslaught of peni that wanted to get too close. That my culture just accepted, you have to remember this was pre-Anita Hill. Bff and I used to make up these jokes to repel boys, although we did our make-up with an intensity that I have never known again. I mean we were playing the game too, but we didn’t know any more than the boys, hormones are pretty powerful.
3-Do you think Victor Hugo would not have taken on mistresses if he knew his wife was faithful to him?
The main Nihombashi shopping street connects in the south with the Ginza. Nihombashi was the original haunt of Tokyo's great department stores at the start of the 20th century and, although the main shopping focus has moved southwards, Mitsukoshi's flagship shop and the grand Takashimaya keep the tradition going. Like the Ginza department stores, they both carry limited stocks of Japanese single malt, although I must say Mitsukoshi's selection is particularly limited.
The ‘Ohana Cup will be a tough challenge for the USA Tomahawks that will feature players based locally in America that will include a number of debutants that the coaching staff are keen to evaluate. The Tomahawks, currently ranked 11th in the world, will come into the match as underdogs against the 9th ranked Tongans.
You get an assignment back, and your grade is an H. Since when is H a grade? Oh yeah, you’re a foreign exchange student in South Africa! That makes sense. South African students work to receive a National Senior Certificate (like a diploma) and also have a different grading system, A through H.
July 18 Think Ink 7pm-9pm
First of all I added a terrifying amount of butter. It is amazing that I still happily tuck into all these cakes after seeing what goes into them! The same amount of sugar was then measured into the bowl. It was hard to keep my concentration as I had to keep an almost constant rendition of “Oranges and Lemons” going. It's Isaac's new favourite song and I'm expected to perform it whenever it is requested!! I also had to contend with tins of chopped tomatoes and soup rolling around my feet. It was quite an assault course to retrieve the flour. After tripping on a tin and stubbing my toe I finally made my way back to the scales. I had to weigh in the self-raising flour. A couple of teaspoonfuls of baking powder made their way into the bowl, swiftly followed by the eggs. I nearly jumped out of my skin when Isaac suddenly shrieked “EGGS” he was overcome with excitement!! I managed to crack four into the bowl, without losing any shell into the mixture. There is a first time for everything! Last of all I extracted a large bottle of milk from the fridge. My number obsessed little assistant kindly helped me count four tablespoonfuls into the awaiting bowl.
Step 6: Distress.
-Katie
I don't think we will use the brown bicones since we are going to be using either silver plated bead wire or black softflex, but I have lots of extra crystal and black diamond bicones.
I am embarrased to say.
-I am sad that Cooper won't get to have the memories me and the girls have
And there’s the Apocalypse.
So, what would be the tally if this is done? AL 130, BNP 118, JP 5, JI 5, LDP 1, independent 10.
Toni stopped by the blog today to share a few of her writing quirks. Enjoy!
It is obvious that Ireland is heading towards default (as close as a country can get to being insolvent) so racking up further debt, rather than trying to reduce it, is close to criminally negligent.
CHICAGO—A Chicago man pleaded guilty today to federal charges for placing a backpack that he thought contained a powerful explosive device into a curbside trash container on a crowded North Side street near Wrigley Field in September 2010. The defendant, Sami Samir Hassoun, pleaded guilty to one count each of attempted use of a weapon of mass destruction and attempted use of an explosive device, resolving charges that have been pending since he was arrested during the very early morning on September 19, 2010. The purported bomb was actually an inert device that was provided by undercover FBI agents who were investigating and monitoring Hassoun’s proclaimed determination to commit acts of violence in Chicago for monetary gain and to cause local political instability.
kiss kiss, ﻿
That's not to say that all Libertarians keep pointy-hooded robes in their closets. But it is to say that it's not difficult to see why the ideology itself attracts so many adamant racists. Now that we have another ardent Libertarian on the national stage, one who's aligned with the similarly, thinly veiled racists of the Tea Party (you know, those crowds of white people clamoring to take "their" country back), here's hoping that the "liberal media" will keep up the "attack" on Rand's self-contradictory stance on the Civil Rights Act. Maybe they'll also be able to figure out just what kind of racist he is too.
Brown bested Democrat Martha Coakley in a special 2009 election, where the dead voted, by 5 points. One has to ask, with Martha having had more experience than Warren; will the vote fall along partisan lines as usual? If that is the case, one can anticipate Warren receiving the 35%of Democrat Votes, while Brown will take the Republican vote (11 to 12%) and the Independent Vote should break 50/40 for Brown given the same manner in which it broke in 2009.
All I wanted here was to capture the flower.
Health Freak Salad
For understand
Not me, certainly not me. I would have argued with you about that.
Grape Man 2: “No. Car wash. You know. They put the… they no let me do.”
Me: Do you have any Goats for sale?
Family Fun magazine supplied me with some delicious recipes for the day.
I am not sure if the cameraman is or is not a c*** but the presenter appeared unperturbed.
Economic Slavery.
There are lots and lots of things on the walls to keep your interest. Many of them have Disney references. I posted a few below that I was able to get pictures of when there was room
Now, all you have to do is apply it to your face with a flat foundation brush or your *clean* hands. Leave it on for 10-15 minutes and rinse off. It comes off super easily. The book says that you will be able to see a difference in a couple of weeks.
The MV teaser shows us rapper JunHyung lying on the floor (supposed to be ‘dying’ ?) and received a breathe mask from a red dress girl. Then the teaser continues to tease by showing BEAST members GiKwang and HyunSeung dancing in the rain topless!
Fold the cream into the berry mixture. Pour into the prepared pan, sprinkle with reserved crumbs and freeze until frozen, about 6 hours. Cut in serving size pieces and garnish with fresh strawberries.
I am hearing...Benny bark the day away. That pup loves to be outside and he also loves to hear the sound of his own bark. Any tips on training this dog to not bark at the wind? We are not wanting to use a shock collar.
A World I Never Made is an atmospheric novel of suspense with brilliantly drawn characters and back-stories as compelling as the plot itself. It is the kind of novel that resonates deeply and leaves its traces long after you turn the final page.
Kendrick Smithyman / Three Poems / 52
“Careful over there, there’s a slippery spot. Don’t wear socks in that room. You need to put on your cleats.”
He called lyricist Sidney Clare and said, “How about ‘The Good Ship Lollipop’ for Shirley?”
Day 272 – April 18, 2012
During day, when I go about being cold, getting colder, surviving a gray rain that slowly morphs into snow, I long for you. You open your arms and let me curl up against you every night and your love seep into my core like microwaves, warming me from the inside.
These Alphabet and Number Angels are also available.
The U.S. can mandate or possibly commandeer specific groups with proper equipment to work on this cleanup...but do we have the equipment at hand? The past department heads who allowed all the citations against BP to go unanswered, need to be held accountable as well.
PAPER AIRPLANE FLYING CONTEST
Have been busy with mundane house work , shopping and all that jazz!
Stamps: Botanical Bookplate Vol.1 and Vol.2 (Flourishes)
CFLBE Blog (cflbeblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
He nodded to the two men behind her and their grip increased. Amber flailed, desperate to escape. It was impossible. She stamped on their feet, kicked their legs, wriggled with all of her strength, but they wouldn’t let her go.
Painted by Christofano di Francesco (usually known as Sassetta) around 1450, this simple painting portrays Saint Anthony, a religious hermit who lives in a desert, being sexually tempted. Art academic types see a sinister face on the woman. She is, apparently, attempting to bewitch St. Anthony by standing so as to reveal her female form. As I understand this type of painting, we can see the evil wings protruding from her back, but St. Anthony cannot, just as St. Anthony's halo would be invisible to the woman.
The college website also shows Forts was part of an Assumption trip to Europe in May 2010. Students toured Venice, Italy, as part of a program integrating “the study of politics, arts, literature, philosophy, theology and history to help students reflect upon the heritage of the Western world.”
1.Spray slow cooker cooking surface with nonstick cooking spray.
Drowning in her tears
This wasn’t enough and the government had to increase the opex to RM151 billion.
I told him, "Ohhhh boy. You don't have any idea what embarrassment is." Then I said, so everyone within a 20 mile radius could hear, "THIS IS MY SON! ISN'T HE CUTE? I'M SO PROUD OF HIM! I LOVE THIS GUY!"
You've made your point without sounding like this is an expose of something. You've got to tell a story well to make your readers care. Otherwise you're writing a treatise and I don't represent those if I can help it.
Commander, U.S. Air Forces in Europe (’04-’05)
Remember, in a former post, when I said that Saudis were captivated and shocked by what happened in Tunis and Egypt but hadn’t collectively made up their mind about it? Well it appears that they have. Everywhere I go and everything I read points to a revolution in our own country in the foreseeable future. However we are still on the ledge and haven’t jumped yet.
black dog books are donating the proceeds of SHORT AND SCARY to Australian youth mentoring programs like Big Brothers and Big Sisters.
JT - But it’s not unfair speculation, is it, and what I’m saying … but let’s be clear on this as well, there’s a lot of myth and rumour about all of this and misinformation, let’s be fair, but, as it stands Rangers can go into further liquidation, emerge as a newco or an incubator company as Bill Miller prefers to call it, and there will, provided they do that before the end of the season, there will be no further sanctions and they remain on the SPL. Is that correct?
“Husbands, love your wives, just as Christ loved the church and gave himself up for her to make her holy, cleansing her by the washing with water through the word, and to present her to himself as a radiant church, without stain or wrinkle or any other blemish, but holy and blameless. In this same way, husbands ought to love their wives as their own bodies. He who loves his wife loves himself. After all, no one ever hated his own body, but he feeds and cares for it, just as Christ does the church—for we are members of his body. “For this reason a man will leave his father and mother and be united to his wife, and the two will become one flesh.” This is a profound mystery—but I am talking about Christ and the church. (Ephesians 5:25-32)
All of those songs spent at least 10 weeks atop Billboard's Hot 100 chart between 2000 and 2009.
session. They cheered me on and said, "Burn that
Intense feelings of nervousness, tenseness, or panic, often in reaction to interpersonal stresses; worry about the negative effects of past unpleasant experiences and future negative possibilities; feeling fearful, apprehensive, or threatened by uncertainty; fears of falling apart or losing control.
It can be applied pragmatically to the problems and joys of our physical and mental life. It is a utilitarian short-hand, which always refers to something beyond, far beyond the particular instance it is spoken or written, far beyond the medium and context in which it is uttered or inscribed.
When you join him at the door, a uniformed police officer informs you that your son Bobby has been arrested for driving a stolen car, trying to rob a gas station, and threatening the attendant with a gun. The officer doesn't call him Bobby, he refers to him as Robert Fife, the accused.
sorry, you need to use the link to see this..
The point here is that you need to get out of your own head when it comes to the financial abundance that may have eluded you to this point and become abundant in all ways. To thine own self be true when it comes to the truth of financial abundance within you.
Here are the new Spring line of Mommy Wraps for BOYS.....
Background Focus
-2 star anise
Economic empowerment and the eradication of poverty first begins with understanding the history of how this country was built, how we rebuild during economic downfalls, and how the least of God’s children are impacted. It requires us to look at the missing piece between the have’s and have not’s.
I hope everyone had a wonderful weekend. I know that am ready for monday to be here since my girls have done nothing but fight this weekend. Until next time. :)
10. In Bloom
Now, the palette was dynamic,
Dear Publix,
I should note that there ARE actually a lot of bands out there who release some quality stuff in this genre, seemingly coming from nowhere – but you can tell that a lot of new bands coming right now simply haven’t got “it”.
You'll eat anything Daddy eats. You sit next to him at dinner and he just pushes food from his plate over onto yours when you start pointing at him. You want nothing to do with me giving you food. It's all about Daddy.
Here 'tis. A big slice of the famous 'Suttons farm' apple pie.
When I organize the Toddler Art Program at work, one of the things I encourage parents to do is allow their child to experience use of materials that they might not normally feel was “age appropriate”. Some kids really hate getting their hands dirty when offered fingerpaints, but pass them a paintbrush and they will happily create masterpiece after masterpiece. Some kids are more mechanically inclined and will appreciate the chance to try out Daddy’s flashlight, or toys with little working parts. My Simon likes to put things into other things, so the caps, buttons, fabric scraps, and pom poms are all perfect tools for him to engage in this kind of play.
If you were wondering where to go to purchase Christmas gifts or cards, I would suggest you start with Shutterfly! They have a lot of deals going on right now, so you better check them out while they last!
I know if I do the best I can, let His will happen, then everything will always be as it's supposed to be.
So - long story short, he called, we had dinner last night, and we chatted. And chatted and chatted. And then talked. We were at the restaurant for close to 3 hours. It felt like - there was no pressure. I was so at ease, I didn't feel like I needed to impress him, it didn't feel like he was trying to impress me. We just... got along.
File size: 83Mb
By derby, we mean the Kentucky Derby. Today was the 138th derby ran at Churchill Downs.
As a result of Cllr Latty’s intervention on the Park being in the SHLAA, and some complaints received from individual Friends, Leeds Planning asked FOPP for a map of the Park – which we have now given them. Planning have said it is highly likely that the land will be removed from the database at the next SHLAA Partnership meeting in June/July 2012.
Disc Three: Promise of the Flesh
So let me walk you through our little garden as best as I can using these pics. In the lower left hand corner we have ground cover which we kept from the previous owner's garden. But the little tree popping out is a Japanese Elm which we planted. Behind the Elm you can see some of our Mum plants which were also from before. They get huge and the stalks get heavy with blooms, but they are so pretty and yield soooo many flowers. Lots of blooms to bring inside. Love them. (On that side we also have a Judy Garland Rose bush, a Desert Hibiscus, and a Hawaiian Hibiscus.)
Alex has begun translating his "freshman year" into a narrative transcript. He has also begun research into several potential internships with locally owned businesses. He has already secured himself a student assistantship with the Chattanooga Theater Center as Assistant Manager for the production of Jack and the Beanstalk.
I have tried so many times and it never lasts. If I could manage to make it through one week that would be a miracle! I would always get sidetracked looking for fabulous recipes, because really, who wants to eat the same thing over and over again. Blech!
In a shallow dish, mix together the garlic powder, pepper, salt, paprika, bread crumbs and flour. In a separate dish, whisk together the milk and egg.
A few things that make Chained for Life so intriguing is how they manage to keep certain twins in the dark about certain information. Usually one has to be asleep or there’s a curtain between them. It tends to create very odd juxtapositions that almost feel like a metaphor for the dual nature of man. The other fun aspect of the film is the frequent use of Vaudeville acts (I suspect to pad the film to feature-length). There’s a wise-cracking juggler, a man who does bicycle stunts, and an accordion player who blasts through The William Tell Overture, in addition to the Hilton Twins three duets they sing together.
Billy Graham has a book called the Heaven Answer Book. It is promoted as Billy Graham answering questions about heaven.
Husband: James Fitzgerald (m. 27-Jun-1965, div. 1975)
But the Jews were in the majority. There were thousands of them and only one apostle. They could not be wrong. Can’t we trust numbers? What about the days of Noah? There were but eight who were saved from that universal flood. The majority was wrong. What about Sodom and Gomorrah? How many were saved there? Only Lot and his two daughters were saved from the destruction.
Remember the old days of the Reform Party?
Burke apologizes for keeping Hibbs in the dark, but it was necessary to the operation; Hibbs is not dissembler enough to have been able to play a role. Hibbs sheepishly admits that he now wishes he'd taken "Colonel Yates's" advice and gone to bed. It would have saved everyone a lot of trouble -- especially himself.
The Poor Richard's Ale that I brewed recently was a success at a runners gathering, the other night. It's a good session beer, and I'm growing more fond of it every time I have a glass. At first, I didn't want to brew a beer with corn in it, but it turned out to be very OK.
Keep myself and my team in your prayers as we make this leap of faith!
Meeting her for the first time.
here is a photo of me and Lisa in the "photobooth" gear, in front of our banner:
I hear many people saying “it isn’t our problem”. Now, this is debatable. Syria probably is our problem as much as it is Syria’s problem. A long drawn out war in Syria could spell disaster for the Middle East, and could also draw in other countries if allowed to continue. A war in Syria could easily result in anarchy, like that which followed the fall of Siad Barre in Somalia in 1991. And when a country descends into anarchy, it can cause a lot of problems. When a country descends into anarchy, it could easily become a breeding ground for terrorism, such as Al Qaeda, and no doubt other insurgencies, such as the ones in Iraq, would also benefit somehow. A long civil war could easily cause security concerns for the west. If Syria isn’t our problem now, it could easily become our problem in the future.
Yes, I could have added it to any random Amazon.ca order, but I always forgot to do so when I was ordering books from the site…I really ought to write things down.
"NO! I'm not gonna kiss his ass and lie, but I can ask him questions about the project and make him look good at least."
To be fair, the samples in the study were suspicious to begin with and that is why they were seized by the customs in the first place. To repeat the introduction of last week’s post, traditional Chinese medicines have been used for thousands of years and their effectiveness is getting international attention. In addition, many of the traditional Chinese medicines are well studied, owing to universities and other institutions dedicated to studying such medicines. Therefore, I want to emphasize that the majority of the traditional Chinese medicine on the market today are probably safe and legal. With that being said, it is still a good practice for consumers to know the origins of their medications and judge whether the source can be trustworthy.
And that's where copywriters come in.
A minute or two later, she ordered "just give me 50% of this one and 50% of this one. I'm bossy aren't I? Well, once we get these colors right you won't have to see me for another 16 years."
RONETTES – YOU BABY
All the evil-wishers in the
Now I know that this is not a clothing item however, I do wear those two items all throw the spring and summer as for one thing sandals are so comfortable to wear and I also can walk in them all day. As for sunglasses; well I have those on because most of the time, the sun always bothers my eyes and I always do that ugly squatting face…. Trust me it’s not very attractive for one bit.
Thence to console myself at piquet and decadence. Viz. Where at the former I appear to have won a great deal of money. The act of winning this sum thus occasioned another player and jealous rapscallion to accuse me of cheating. It being my firm and unalterable belief to uphold my honour in such venerable company as Lord and Lady Sprignell, I thus called him out. The dispute to be settled the following (this) a.m.
parable goes:
Ordering white carpet for the dining room may have been ill-advised, but I’m planning to serve only cauliflower, butter, and cream of wheat for the first few years.
As I am a bend of you....
here she is practicing her step-cross-step-heel.
A surprised laugh escapes my mouth, and I realize he’s been people watching too. I look over at the guy pumping gas next to us, the one I’m guessing prompted Aidan’s non-politically correct question – he looks like Santa Claus’s much less jolly alter ego. I start to pay closer attention to all the other patrons, and I suddenly I feel like I’ve slipped into the pages of a Stephen King novel. Aidan’s right – these guys are creepy.
2 wheel
Except when it comes to Will. Even as the office storylines, both professional and personal, get more and more interesting, Will remains mired in his investigation. He pursues this investigation doggedly, ignoring advice, warnings, and threats. This should make him seem heroic and principled, but instead Will comes off as stubborn, inconsiderate, and ridiculously, improbably lucky--during an FBI lockdown of his building, for example, he manages to sneak unseen into his office, which allows him to discover that a listening device placed there had been removed, and to conclude that whoever placed it there works in the building. In some ways this is another example of how seamlessly Rubicon transplants the conspiracy story into the real world--when the hero of a standard conspiracy thriller is told by a source that to give him classified information would jeopardize their jobs or lives, they are usually throwaway characters we don't care about, but Rubicon draws these characters well enough that we can't ignore the risks they're taking. The problem is that Will does ignore those risks, and that he himself is so closed off that while we're sympathizing with the people who put themselves on the line for him, he is hard to sympathize with. Dale came to Rubicon fresh off what should have been a star-making turn on HBO's The Pacific, where he managed to convey his character's intelligence, humor, and passion with a single look, so the fact that Will is such an emotionless blank is clearly a choice, and one that should have worked. Will has been emotionally shut down since the deaths of his wife and daughter (on 9/11, no less), and his investigation forces him to engage with the world--in positive ways, as when he starts a relationship with his bohemian neighbor, and less positive ones, as when he deals with the aftermath of killing an assassin in self-defense. But there's something very arrogant and off-putting about Dale's performance. He never really sells Will's grief for his dead loved ones, his anger at the perversion of justice happening around him, or his determination to prevent further loss of life. It's hard not to conclude, finally, that the events of the season are nothing more than an intellectual puzzle for Will, a protracted and costly expression of his need to understand, to know, to be right and in control, and yet the show doesn't commit to that reading of the character either, leaving an empty hole at its center.
I know he is watching, he knows if I am good or bad so I need to be good for goodness sake! Trust me Santa I’m trying, but it’s so hard.
It was cold to start.
Would have cry baby face…
(Being text of a press conference addressed by Save Nigeria Group (SNG) on the Report of the House of Representatives Probe of the Subsidy Reforms in Nigeria, on Monday April 30, 2012.)
If you read the post Sunday from Flourishes HERE, you already know my exciting news! Or if you have just arrived and don't know, I was recently invited to be a member of Flourishes Timeless Tuesday Design Team! I am so excited and honored to have been asked, I have been using their stamps for two years now and I even dreamed of being on their team one day! Still can't believe they asked me and I'm still in shock but excited to get started so let's begin, shall we?
A couple of weeks ago, you may recall, the Barnet Eye posted a blog what Mrs Angry thought was the most amusing heading of the year so far:
I love sports – watching them that is.
21. Emanuelle's theme (02:40)
A Movie Town Richer (And More Beloved) Than Hollywood
BUT IF salt has lost it’s taste. Do you know what happens in salt in Syria and Palestine when it looses it’s saltiness? It is scattered on the ground in piles. It becomes the most worthless thing. Like Jesus said, it is no longer good for anything. So this little if is going to tell us what happens if we aren’t helping to keep the earth from moral corruption.
ALSO: I am participating in Me Made May! Why? Well, as Zoe says: It is a personal attempt to achieve a better relationship with your handmade creations. The last few times I felt I did not have enough me made clothes to participate, but now I'm up for a new challenge. So, here goes:
Dad got me some beer mugs for Christmas to add to my collection - a Yuengling pilsner glass & a Sierra Nevada mug. Cool! Did Santa bring you any cool brew gear! Tomorrow I want to post on what Santa didn't bring - my equipment wish list for 2008.
The fact that all of the migrants on board are men tells us that this is most likely a ploy to game the refugee system to get family and friends into the country. The successful asylum claim opens the door to seemingly endless chain migration where whole families have been transported to Canada out of one immigration application. The problem with this is that these immigrants do not need any pertinent job skills or language skills to immigrate to Canada. It is likely the 76 men on the Ocean Laddy do not have either as well.
in 1994, the two countries established a joint committee for economic, cultural, and scientific and technical cooperation.
The slightly selfish part of me declined........
Since the first Kidzania opened in Mexico 12 years ago, some 20 have popped up or are about to pop up around the world. Tokyo, Jakarta, Dubai, Seoul. Mumbai opens next year. Singapore in 2014. None yet in the US though…
The purport of these ślokas can only be realized by fully developing the rational portion of our life, not the animal portion. Sitting at the feet of the Ācāryadeva, let us try to understand from this transcendental source of knowledge what we are, what is this universe, what is God, and what is our relationship with Him. The message of Lord Caitanya is the message for the living entities and the message of the living world. Lord Caitanya did not bother Himself for the upliftment of this dead world, which is suitably named Martyaloka, the world where everything is destined to die. He appeared before us four hundred fifty years ago to tell us something of the transcendental universe, where everything is permanent and everything is for the service of the Absolute. But recently Lord Caitanya has been misrepresented by some unscrupulous persons, and the highest philosophy of the Lord has been misinterpreted to be the cult of the lowest type of society. We are glad to announce tonight that our Ācāryadeva, with his usual kindness, saved us from this horrible type of degradation, and therefore we bow down at his lotus feet with all humility.
Michael Caine/Steve Martin (Dirty Rotten Scoundrels)
Shooting aside, the camera is unwieldy, stubbornly resetting after minor movements and often going berserk when players back into a corner. With enemies pouring in from all angles in infested zones, be prepared for constant attacks from behind by unseen foes.
The bombing on Monday came hours after the Iraqi government reached a potential breakthrough to relocate 3,400 Iranian dissidents living at a camp inside Iraq’s borders, potentially unwinding a standoff between Iraq and the camp’s residents. The exiles are members a paramilitary group that has tried to topple Iran’s government and is listed as a terrorist group by the United States. They were given refuge by Saddam Hussein during his war with Iran, but the current Iraqi government, with closer ties to Iran, has vowed to dismantle the camp in eastern Iraq.
Granulated white sugar 2 cups (400 grams)
V.N.Purav Marg, Deonar
You accept MMRILS. You accept that Jews are a minority. Yet you do not accept that MMRILS applies to Jews. You appear to be treating them favorably even while denying that they are favorably treated.
The look of the film works; cinematographer Larry Fong (300, Watchmen, Sucker Punch) gives us many callbacks to more familiar setups from any given Spielberg work, including a few of his producer-only titles as The Goonies and Poltergeist. Editors Maryann Brandon and Mary Jo Markey give us the quick cuts familiar to any of The Man's early work, and even some of his later ones.
So it’s an uphill battle all week. A guy can’t win.
Steve Zahn’s Davis tried to persuade Kim Dickins’ character to stay by giving her a perfect day in the Big Easy. He started with beignets from Cafe du Monde. Mom and Elle agreed that was a perfect start to a perfect day. He followed with Jon Boutte serenading on the porch. Boutte wrote and performs the show’s title track, “The Treme Song.” Davis followed breakfast with a walk and a nap – genius. Then took her to see the Soul Rebels. I can offer no explanations as to why she left after a day like that.
I'm going to be honest, I don't know what to post about today.
In my opinion:
Links to articles, blog posts, etc., that I found especially interesting this week:
He has a problem with the idea that “the state doesn’t have rights to limit individuals’ wants and passions.” Notice he doesn’t say the state has a right to limit how you act on your wants and passions (which it does if said wants and passions hurt another person)…but he actually said the state can legislate your wants and passions. Your thoughts and feelings. What you usually think of when you hear the terms “Thought Crimes” or “Big Brother” are nothing compared to what Santorum wants. Not even entitled to the sanctity of your own mind. Nope, the government can legislate that too.
He said the city had to “build the base within communities” to support the plan. He said the plan didn’t engage equity and social justice, such as access to affordable housing and transportation. (His comments about housing could be seen as supportive of but ultimately critical of projects like Atlantic Yards.)
so that I may freely
Trying to explain the beauty of Shakespeare to a group of unruly teenagers too busy sending text messages to listen felt like a soul-destroying way to earn a living. It was frustrating work, and secondary school teacher Sarah Kerr felt so demoralised that she needed an escape plan.
Here is the full video of what cops get up to when they are on duty and supposed to guard a prisoner in hospital.
I've never helped to host a swap before so I am SO excited -I have an obsession with mugs-my kitchen will vouch for that, and I can't wait to find some new bloggers!
Anyway, on to my creative space- this was something I did last week that was soooo enjoyable- covering school books. Yes I hear you say - how can that be enjoyable but I really did enjoy doing this- probably helped that I set my little space up with a coffee and the sky remote too!
Kris Young has worked as a screenwriter for more than 20 years and currently teaches screenwriting at the L.A. Film Studies Center and UCLA. He lives in Southern California with his wife, Celine, and son, Skye. He is currently “between dogs” but is hoping to welcome a new one sometime soon.
Esto Es Felicidad
So, I was at the beach yesterday with a bunch of friends and it was so much fun. Here are some pictures!!
I'm calling this one a success! A craft I attempt and it actually turns out decent.
Place the slices of serrano pepper into the bottom of the cocktail shaker. Muddle the peppers to release their juices. Pour in the tequila, triple sec, lime juice, and mango juice. Put the lid on the shaker (hold on to it!) and shake, shake, shake!
Velcro and Ceilidh
I am not particularly interested in a 'new generation' as such: I am interested in the way continuities work in changed circumstances.
Something comes over me in the fall, and I morph into a domestic Martha Stewart wannabe. I decorate my house with leaves, pine cones, acorns, chinese lanterns, and strings of crimson berries. I buy gourds, pumpkins, and rich spice candles, to add warmth and character to my rooms. In addition, I bake like there is no tomorrow! (I should probably warn my co-workers about this before the onslaught of goodies overwhelms the office.) Apple Pumpkin Muffins, Cranberry Scones, Pumpkin Pies, Apple Pies… you name it, and I probably bake it in the Fall. Those who know me can attest that none of this is normal, year-round behavior; but when it’s Autumn I just can’t help myself!
in cold, dead leaves
_____Sometimes I like to repost some of my older stuff just to see if you all are paying attention.
I know you are doing a fansigning event in Daegu
Keene’s Nancy Drew & The Triple Hoax: I read all of the Nancy Drew paperbacks from #57-#83, until I grew out of them. It crushed me a little later in life to realize that “Caroline Keene” didn’t really exist, that “she” wasn’t a she – or not a single female author, anyway, but a series of men and women ghostwriters. But I got over it, and I’ve loved mysteries ever since. I was between 8 and 11 while reading these.
Soft songs through café flowed.
Enjoy the rest of your weekend guys.
Yet empires do come crashing down, of course. The fact that the form has proven to be enduring has not given a comparable endurance to any individual empire. Britons during Victoria’s reign liked to boast that the sun never set on the British empire—though that may have been, as the Irish liked to suggest, because God Himself wouldn’t trust an Englishman in the dark—but the sun did set on that empire in due time, and once the sunset started, it proceeded with remarkable speed. Children who were just old enough to remember the celebration of Victoria’s diamond jubilee in 1897, when the empire was not far from its zenith, had not yet reached retirement age when the last tattered scraps of that empire went whistling down the wind.
For 7 years i lived n Barrow Alaska, the Top of the World, a short stay in arctic terms. It's population only about 50% Native, and the rest is a beautiful mix of people from much more tropical places and random misfits that found their way there. Tourism is a thriving industry there. It's a structured and well cultivated system that feeds it's supporters well. I made a tidy living there easily, not having to rely so much on internet sales or cold calls. It's a place where Celebrities and famous people stop by, a place where thousands of scientists pontificate, a place where old meets new and melds in a ying yang type situation. Amazing things happen there, but there is the darker side to the mix. A place where alcohol and modern drugs are easy to obtained and abused, a place where cultural clashes become violent, a place where hope is mixed with despair, a place where you can be a stranger and an unknown.
“Every time Obama opens his mouth, his subjects and verbs are in agreement,” says Mr. Logsdon. “If he keeps it up, he is running the risk of sounding like an elitist.”
The Washington Post says that the 24-page report was submitted to the relevant congressional committees who are investigating the scandal, and those officials will not release the full extent of their findings.
I haven’t felt so good in such a long time even though this all happened in a dream.
The attention paid to these critical scenes is not all an ego thing, either. We are not doing our JOB as storytellers if we are not delivering the core experiences of our genre. Genre is a PROMISE to the audience or readers; it’s a pact.
wake up, have nursies, go up front, have a pre-breakfast bite, get cozy, cuddle – probably have a few more nursies – then get down to it: books, play-doh, trucks, ball.
Includes basic antivirus protection PLUS: email protection (POP3), AntiPhishing, AntiSpyware, AntiAdware and more. With real-time on-access scanning, profile-based on-demand scans and scheduling of full system scanning and updates it offers premium protection. It includes a POP3 based MailScanner that scans emails before they are stored on your machine. With a user-friendly control center, quarantine management, fast performance and world leading detection rates the Avira AntiVir Premium provides essential protection for your PC.
Cookies are a great accompaniment to your coffee or tea. They come in various flavors and shapes. I whipped up these this afternoon using chopped dates.
So let's do salty-sweet today, okay? And crunchy-fluffy. And buttery.
It just happened to be the weekend that I had to start my volunteer job of teaching M-girl's First Communion class. It took up the morning, but we were done by lunchtime on Saturday, so I still had plenty of weekend left. I had time for some chores, and then we all headed back to the church for 4 o'clock mass. Once home we had dinner, and then found a movie on Netflix. I stayed up a little too late with my hubby, but it's such a luxury to sit and talk after the kids are in bed. Besides, I knew I could sleep in on Sunday and then have the whole day stretching out before me.
I got my master’s in education.
Challenge: Make a card or layout using this as inspiration. Then, email it to me at thynner5@yahoo.ca or link it below. I will post the April prize on Sunday to check back!!
So anything to do with the yummy stuff!! Colours, images, you name it! Here is my make using newbie freebie Ferguson...
Life is good,
Someone had mentioned using a baking soda + water scrub to bleach/weather their wood, so I gave that a try....
Great shall the battle be twixt the forces,
This weekend was jam-packed with goodness. I just love weekends like that! Friday night we got to hang out with Nick and Cindy and made grilled pizza for the first time this year! Yummm.
· Walk along a riverbed to follow a twig or leaf as it floats down the river.
09 What Happens When The Heart Just Stops
There are two situations in my life that make me want to turn to TV:
So there is great stuff at work here, including a nice if derivative rock score (70's cop show funk rumbling in the garage with sitar-tinged fairy folk revivalism) and interesting, almost Buffy-esque, twists that tie the horror in with social anxiety, i.e. what if your suicide doesn't work and you get left behind by your gang of undead biker friends?
I am shadow, I am light
They must have heard I was looking forward to a nice child free rest.
According to British MP Michael Meacher in an article for The Guardian, Omar Saeed Sheikh- the man who beheaded US journalist Daniel Pearl in 2002- was a British MI-6 agent. He says it was Sheikh who- at the behest of Pakistani ISI General Mahmood Ahmed- wired the $100,000 to Mohammed Atta from Standard Chartered’s Dubai branch before 911. Meacher’s claim has been corroborated by Dennis Lomel- director of FBI’s financial crimes unit- and by an October 11, 2001 article in The Times of India. Mocatta Metals is also a favorite conduit for Israeli Mossad financing.
Can't believe I did that in public!
I decided to hit the town right away. I asked Kirsten some places she recommended, and enjoyed all of the areas she sent me.
So I need to stay young both in body, soul and spirit. I need to exercise the body to keep fit and I need to do mental calisthenics to avoid Dementia which is the loss of my brain function that occurs with certain diseases. Alzheimer’s disease is one form of dementia that gradually gets worse over time. It will affect my memory, my thinking, and my behavior.
I try to maintain good relations with all members of the clergy, but I usually feel them out before going into spiritual issues until I sense they are on the same page with me and with the Holy Spirit. I know its not their fault, its just that the depth of their spirituality varies depending on their seminary and life experiences especially if they have not been introduced to the Baptism of the Holy Spirit.
Habit 4 - Think Win/Win
365 Days of Blessings is an answer to a call to count my blessings, and to encourage others to do the same.
Industrial property offices have a great responsibility in maintaining a healthy market, by being cautious before granting industrial property rights. The combination of Articles 83 and 85 of the Community Design Regulation creates a powerful instrument for corporations. Aggressive registration of questionable designs followed by summary injunctions seeking a European ban is an effective technique for eliminating competition.
"The first police that arrived at the scene weren't equipped to intervene against heavily armed robbers," Goranzon said. "When the right forces arrived the helicopter took off."
From us, and we would never
A play that ultimately makes everyone ask themselves regardless of ethnicity, where do you belong?, as one of the character puts it so well
We are created to be vessels through which He can pour out His abundance and blessing.
There were lots of "S" words involved in this 2nd grade lesson. The Shape of our State was used as the base. The students learned about Space (not outer) and chose to draw at least 5 Kansas Symbols in either the positive or negative space.
It's Advent, after all. As we prepare to walk in the steps of Jesus, let's remember that His disciples got on his last nerve on numerous occasions. Think of all the times they ran to Him with their hair on fire, worried about what people thought of them, frightened that He was too generous and forgiving. They were aggravated with Him, too.
The Year of the Diamond Dogs
I digress.
I recall times in my own life when I allowed myself to become so distracted by the activity and storms of others that I failed to “hear” what My Father was saying to me personally. These things became distractions to my spirit, and they threw me off. I became swallowed up in the winds and waves that were assailing them. People experience many extreme situations; and I have been guilty of absorbing their pain, their unsettledness, their confusion rather than personally looking steadfastly to Jesus, seeking Him, and carefully following what He has to say. So as others found themselves in the “extremes and dangers” of life, sometimes not being faithful to look to Jesus for themselves, I allowed that to “color” my inward peace. As they struggled, I struggled with them, noticing their situations, thinking about them too much, experiencing what they were feeling to a point that caused me to become “distracted” from my personal “look” to Jesus; and it broke my focus on precious truth that the Lord had revealed to me and was expecting me to continue to walk in. Beware of this temptation.
It's excellent, unique session beers like this one that make finding places like Free State seeking out. Two types of rye are combined with English Pale Ale malt and dark crystal malt, with Styrian Golding and Crystal hops to balance it out. The subtle rye flavors really add dimension to this brew, and it has a wonderful honey like sweetness to go with all those great fresh malty flavors.
This is a quick hello from me. I have logged in a few times in the last weeks but still didn’t manage to find inspiration again. One of the reasons surely is that things have been rezzing soo slowly. I experimented with different viewers (e.g. Kirsten Viewer) but I felt too impatient to adjust to a new viewer interface with buttons being at different places, more settings, and so I gave up on that.
into inner, higher into lower,
White reflects the most light of any color, and will highlight any surface imperfections.
There are so many options to be looked at, but the problem is when the Premier League for example tries to implement this new law, they need the agreement from a large proportion of the 20 clubs. But can you see the top 4 agreeing to this? I think not.
Hope everyone else had a good Bank Holiday and I'll be trying to catch up on my commenting this evening - after I've waded my way through the pile of ironing!!!
Many types of Heart Diseases – Heart Attacks in Human Being are also Caused due to Inherited Diabetes Patterns in Their Parents/Generation.
In comes one of those women, you know, the kind who has perfect children that would never speak out. The prodigies. The kids who can break rules in other ways, and we’re supposed to overlook them. The kind of woman who sits with all the kids rather than with the adults, oblivious to the fact she’s blocking the view of kids sitting behind her, the kind who thinks the event is solely for her kids and the other kids are just in the way. Come on, we’ve all seen them. Maybe some of us don’t care about their existence, and maybe some agree with that kind of behavior, but I don’t. My child is just that: my child. If I’m there, I will guide. I will discipline. I will nudge. I am in charge, other than the teacher. If you don’t care about their existence, maybe it’s because they’ve never poked your child on the shoulder to say “Stop interrupting!” or because you are easily irritated when others’ kids do something you find misbehaving so you speak up. (If you’re one who speaks up to strangers’ children, here’s a thought: mind your beeswax. If it’s not your house or you’re not the teacher, restrain yourself. If you can’t control your behavior and reactions, don’t expect your children, or others’ kids, to control theirs either.)
I just received my contributor's copy of Esli (which is Russian for "If"), which contains a translation of "For I Have Lain Me Down on the Stone of Loneliness and I'll Not Be Back Again."
Where I live in the Texas Hill Country, hundreds of creeks meander through the oak-covered hills, canyons, and ranches. A few of these creeks run year round, but most are seasonal. Many of the creeks are, in fact, dry most of the time. This has been especially true during the last year, when we have been experiencing a devastating drought. But, when torrential rain comes, the creeks quickly fill with rushing water, water that often overflows the creek banks.
Total covered gross floor area on all floors of all buildings on a plot/area of the plot
You might, however, transfer the whole thing over to an international conglomerate body under the guise of a global society (which you conquered via the forced use of the dollar as the world currency). And you might even replace the national dollar with an international one. Heck, you might even back that new dollar with gold, since you are the holder of 90% of the worlds gold, only to later crash the artificial price of gold and start the whole process over again. You might even crash the international dollar. After all, what if aliens invade? It will have to be a intergalactic currency then, eh? But I digress…
I don’t normally pay much attention to human politicians, but occasionally one of them says something that makes me scratch my chin with my toenails. The latest to accomplish this feat was Senator Marleen Temmerman, a Belgian parliamentarian who has urged the wives of her male colleagues to deny them conjugal privileges until they approve a new government.
Have I got a treat for you folks! Carrie over at Carrie's Experimental Kitchen graciously agreed to help me out this week while away getting married. Actually, as of today I will already have been married for over 12 hours!!
When her 51st birthday arrived, she felt the stabbing pain of the single digit sticking out on its own from her strong half-century. “Only half-way to a hundred and two” Sophia consoled herself “only three times seventeen.” But it still felt wrong. Its unevenness unsettled her; it wasn’t a prime number and she felt beyond her own prime. She added and subtracted, multiplied and divided, but the numbers kept jumping; they wouldn’t settle, her life wouldn’t balance.
Baba Yaga represents the inhuman, not saying she’s evil, but her agenda does not support the idea that the Earth and its resources are there solely for humanity’s benefit. She stands for those who have not prospered with humanity’s domination over nature, i.e everyone and everything else!
Since, therefore, faith must be kept quiet and held secret among this barbarous and wild people and under this severe rule, how can it at last exist or remain, when there is need for so much trouble and labor, in places where it is preached most faithfully and diligently? Therefore, it happens, and must happen, that those Christians who are captured or otherwise get into Turkey fall away and become altogether Turkish, and it is very seldom that one remains true to his faith, for they lack the living bread of souls and see the free and fleshly life of the Turks and are obliged to adapt themselves to it.
October 18-24 is Teen Read Week! Sponsored by YALSA, this year's theme is Read Beyond Reality @ your library, which encourages teens to read something out of this world, just for the fun of it.Here are a few "beyond reality" musings from YA Author Marlene Perez:
A car accident that befell Nam Soon’s family led them to their deaths except for Nam Soon. He personally witness their deaths including his own sister whom he tried saving, but the heated door handle was too much too bear. In the end, the embedded guilt of his incompetency to save his own sister ensued him with a bizarre disease that made him unable to feel any pain. Knowing that, an ex-convict Bum No uses that disadvantage of Nam Soon as a way to extort money as a loan shark. One day, they were given the task to collect loan payment from a particular girl, Dong Hyun. He persisted in getting the money without the help of Bum No, and in the end, he followed Dong Hyun whom surprisingly is a rare case of haemophilia patient. Thus begins a story of a man whom feels no pain, and a girl whom is afraid of pain.
5. Nebula (4:45)
- 1 teaspoon red pepper flakes
Yesterday after pulling my hair out at the amount of toys we have in this house, (and it's only been a year!) I decided to make a soft boat for all of Casper's stuffed animals. I used an old woollen blanket and some bendy wire things from a baby jungle gym that we were given. The pattern was fairly simple to draw up and I made it while Casper was sleeping. I was going to put in a lining, but decided against the extra work as the wool is thick and strong enough by itself. So I added binding instead.
The biggest swell of defiance was in New York, where protesters had planned to bring the city to a halt by blockading major arteries like the Brooklyn Bridge – and where at least 30 were arrested.
Now, a year ago this past week, Navy SEALS were airlifted in to the Pakistani town of Abbotabad, where they surprised and killed Osama bin Laden. That's right; he got deaded, and tossed into the sea after he was positively identified.
the string may hear you
Exercising: Still hitting the gym...going for a couple mile walks on the strand with Mr. Southbay or my friend... its so nice to get out for fresh air!
If you have a question for Ms. Hawk, feel free to leave it in the comments. Please note that I’ll be cutting questions off at 4:00 p.m. EDT (which is 1:00 p.m. PDT), so don’t dilly-dally!
41. Herbie Hancock - All Apologies (5:08)
Just a short note to let my readers know that Princess Modest Swimwear is once again giving a discount coupon of 10%, which will be available until the end of February. The code is FELICITY.
I'll give that one a go tomorrow, perhaps.
There are no fence sitters on this one.
Trust me…it’s hard to get people to believe that a state agency wants to RETURN money. But Good Morning America took notice a few months ago of our efforts to reunite millions of dollars with Wisconsin residents and businesses and decided to feature the Wisconsin State Treasury on their series, “Show Me The Money!”
I lurk. I do, I'm not ashamed. I go through online resources, I look longingly at blogs and pretty pictures. I get Better Homes and Gardens, I get ReadyMade and DIY Magazine. My regular trips around the interwebs include Instructables and Apartment Therapy. Those few names I dropped are a sad and sorely edited list, yet one I did so as to look less sad/geeky/lurkery than I am pleased to admit. True, I said I am not ashamed, but I do have limits. I am not crazy, just a nerd.
I do hope you all enjoy your Easter Sunday. I hope the sun shines upon your celebration. I hope you take the time to renew yourself and your goals.
While most everyone has Zach Wills (OH) as his main competition the Rosa twins from New Jersey are quickly stepping up as his main rivals. Joe has been setting course records and brother Jim has been right behind. Wills beat 2009 FL All-American Futsum Zeinasellaisse (IN) a few weeks back as well.
We've gotten a few calls from different companies saying we've won trips to Hawaii and Mexico, cruises and free flights all over the United States if we just come listen to a "no pressure" 90 minute presentation about time shares. We first started getting calls when we entered to win a car at a Bridal Fair before we got married. We have never attended a presentation because we weren't 25 and knew we couldn't get anything free. We got a call two weeks ago once again saying we've won tons of free stuff so we decided to go see what it was all about it now that Ryan is 25.
We went ice skating on Saturday mornings at the rink and some of the players were there with their little children who could barely walk. No wonder they could skate so well. My brother and I got to know one of the players, Gary Sabourin. To us, having a professional hockey player know us, say hi, talk with us, was one of the best things in life. When Gary went into the NHL and played for the St. Louis Blues, we were able to go to St. Louis twice to see games. Each time our family went very early and stood where the players came in and Gary remembered us and spent time talking with us. Years later, after he’d retired and returned to Parry Sound, my brother visited him while on a motorcycle trip and said Gary was happy to find that we remembered him.
So maybe God is telling you something. And it feels a little crazy to trust it, to have faith that he’s really going to do what he says he going to do. And you’re looking at the situation and thinking, “Pardon me, Lord… but really?”
Summer always has a boyfriend. The two date minimum isn’t an issue for her because she’s always in a relationship, whereas I rarely make it past a second date.
body! There’s such power in speaking in other tongues.
to exact unspecified reparations from the Swedish state for the
The idea of Sunday’s message was simple: we should take the plunge for Jesus because He took the plunge into humanity to die in our place. Good Friday and Easter Sunday are not just 2 extra days on our calendar – they’re game-changers!
* Researching appropriations prospects and strategizing the agency's approach to government officials;
Nursing just seems a bit dead in the water. There’s other ways to help people, small acts of kindness – integrate them into every day life. Don’t ask to be paid for it, don’t make it your career. I’m trying to remember what motivated me into it in the first place. I think it was Khaled Hosseini, that stupid sentence ‘There is a way to be good again’. I kept repeating it to myself weeks after, keep repeating it to myself now
gonna make him earn his freedom back after deserting me for so long like he did... lol
tending as all music does, toward silence,
From the finish (in the Tennessee Volunteers Stadium) I had to figure out how to get to mile 20. I later realized that mile marker 20 was on a bridge. Awesome. After several miles of running around Knoxville I got to about 19.5 just in time to run with my friend Julie. Yes, this makes me a bandit. I felt really bad about the whole thing. Mostly because I was afraid someone was going to publicly shame me in some way.
gold gold gold GOLD
My sister makes cakes, but I haven't quite asked/convinced her to do it, only because she will be babysitting Brayden and studying for her national boards, so I don't know if she would be up for it. I want to do something either jungle themed, car themed, or of course, there is always farming! As of right now, I am definitely undecided on the cake!
But enough with the definitions… except to say that if we’re talking peplum movies in the true fashion sense, then the crowning glory would have to be The Women – the 1939 version, with costumes by the flamboyant Adrian, not the limp 2008 one. The original Women said things like “I never got a sou out of anybody except my first husband, Mr Strauss. Oh he said the most touching thing in his will… He said ‘To my beloved wife Flora, I leave all my estate… To be administered by executors because she is an A-1 schlemiel.’” Now that’s the kind of thing a woman in a peplum should say.
I find it hard not to be funny. As much as I'm a serious-minded individual I think too much seriousness can wear a body down. All of my novels contain funny moments but I don’t really think of my books as comic novels. I think of myself as a serious novelist with stuff to say, you know, meaning-of-life stuff, stuff to go away and ponder. That’s why I write books, to make people think, not to tell stories. Stories are boring.
How do "digital humanities" and "new media" relate? Do they complement or compete as academic memes and methods? Does one take text and the other the rest? Abstracts by 1 March 2011; Victoria E. Szabo (ves4@duke.edu).
I had this story sitting in my draft box since February and wanted to publish it for you. Hopefully you'll get a few laughs from it, maybe. :)
Sentiment: Scrappy Cat
I hope we can learn from the past and we are willing to.
07. Allegro ma non troppo
what will happen tomorrow.
*Gasps all around.*
God bless this land and all her people.
Hello and happy May! I hope you have a wonderful day today and maybe you have some time left over to join us in our new challenge. This week we have a lovely sketch for you to work with. It's my dear friend and the team leader for the A team that has put together the sketch. I really hope you will enjoy working with it. We sure did! Feel free to rotate and resize it. Just as long as we can see the sketch in your creation.
I stayed at the school until 2:30 and hung out in the teacher room. The cleaning lady is quite a character; if words could clean, the school would be sparkling. As it is, the gossip circulates and so does the dirt. Jaco is very friendly though and everyone gets along with her. She enjoys teaching Assyrian to anyone who is willing to learn - I've picked up a few phrases, though my pronunciation doesn't meet the standard John has already set. In the break room, Jaco was teaching one of the Arabic-speaking teachers some Assyrian and I started to catch on to what they were referring to (the conversation was in Arabic). The lesson extended into English as another teacher translated for me. It was fun to learn with them and laugh at our mistakes - it is so easy to feel waaayyyy behind everyone else because they can speak at least two and usually closer to four languages.
The way the interview progresses will depend on the situation. A short vox-pop style interview will last long enough to get the information from the guest and then close, often quite abruptly. A more in-depth or personal interview will usually go through a settling-in stage where simple facts are discussed, then move gently towards the more thorny issues.
Pick out a few of the best looking raspberries and set aside, you'll use these for decoration. Mash the remaining raspberries with the sugar and spread over the base of your cooled tart. Set aside.
I told her my sister works in Angers, and I also mentioned the tiny village of Morannes where my sister and her husband are living. Fabienne happens to live only 15 kilometers from there...
Brian and I refer to it as our Evangelical Hero Complex.
Format: Kindle, epub
where shared gardens and plots bloom in once derelict places
What am I to do? I mean the wedding is tomorrow morning at 3 a.m. my time.
*Stone Double Bastard Ale
General hints: An MTA Day Pass, good for all modes, is $3.50--cheaper if you're a senior. It's only thirty cents more than the cost of two bus trips, or any round trip on the subway or Light Rail, so it's best to get said pass if you anticipate any use other than a simple round trip. Baltimore has also instituted a "smart card" electronic card reader program called the Charm Card, similar to Washington DC's SmartCard; in fact, they are interchangeable, and DC's SmartCards will work on Baltimore's MTA and even carry over cash balances between systems. (These cards do not recognize day passes on the Baltimore system yet, so get a paper "day pass" if you intend to take the above advice.)
a hollow droning to the rain on the roof.
Spread 1 bread slice with mayo. Fill bread slices with all remaining ingredients except dressing.
I had a look at Jones’ bibliography and he appears to have used mainly secondary sources for his research. While this is not a huge issue, it does mean mistakes made in other texts or things that have been disproved are repeated in this book.
Row 2: Chain 1, sc in same stitch as join, single crochet in each of next 2 stitches, 2 single crochet in next stitch, *single crochet in next 2 stitches, 2 single crochet in next stitch, * repeat * to * around, join to first sc. (you should have 19 single crochets)
LR: This is definitely one of the most difficult questions I’ve been asked, and I don’t know the answer…
it's so dark between the lights
I just got back from the gym, where I watched top gear (that show owns my heart) and killing hitler on some history channel. it's a good thing not many people use the gym in my building.
Children
Thanks to Dee at THE REDHEADED STEPCHILD OUT OF THE BASEMENT and SAY ANYTHING for creating the very appropriate logo for the Blogging From A to Z April Challenge. I'm not too swift when it comes to doing these things but I loaded it on my sidebar right there at the top. I encourage all of you who are participants to add it to yours as well so you can be clearly be identified as such. Thank you Dee-- I put both of your sites in the sidebar because I could and because you made the logo for us. I encourage everyone who sees this to go to Dee's site and participate in her Taboo Tuesdays or Saturday Sharing -- these are both opportunities to promote your blogs.
We entered the Corn Barn to a couple playing some beautiful Celtic music. We were greeted by the Fear an Ti (man of the house) and offered a glass of mead or Irish cream liqueur. We were seated at our table and chatted with the couple that were already there. They were actually staying at our same B&B. They were a bit odd, but very friendly!
Means: "Are you still talking?"
I asked all the usual questions. My friend told me that Mr. H was an outdoorsy kind of guy having just returned from two years with the Peace Corps in Africa. My friend had also been a Peace Corps volunteer in Africa. I was in the corporate world and had been for a few years. I was moving up and he was just getting started. I was a little skeptical.
PS: Elaborate.
You say I jest yet the sad fact is you know that panels such as those which decorate the walls of the old St Thomas's hospital South Wing would not be allowed in any publicly funded building built in Britain today, not because of fashion, not because of taste but because of politics. In a modern privately funded building such imagery would be mocked, derided and condemned. There would be an outcry amongst the Guardianista, a Channel 4 documentary would be made about racism in design and maybe even questions would be asked in Parliament ("I call upon my honourable friend, the minister for cultural reassignment, to share my outrage at the saddening and lamentable lack of new order approved diversity in the design of .......") It simply would not happen.
Yet Obama needs a nail on which to hang his hat, so he’s out on the campaign trail summing up his foreign policy thus—Osama bin Laden is dead. But this approach has hit with such a thud that Obama has been forced to jet around the world for fancy photo ops and parade around Bill Clinton to convince the Democrat base that the current Commander-in-Chief is actually up to the task. Clinton is a strange choice, however, *since he is best remembered as the president who refused to kill bin Laden.* ( *pre 9/11 )
Her wording was clear. “This is my song, I wrote it”. In a nuttshell, that’s what Jean stated. No media outlets reported hearing anything from the Knowles clan. Matthew Knowles never came forth with apologies, Beyonce never came forth. They let this girl go unnoticed and her talents unexplored all for their selfish gain. What would have been the harm with giving her the credit for writing the song?
Although I was excited at the idea of seeing Potter film memorabilia in such a close environment, I was a little worried that it would turn out to be like the Star Trek exhibition that Mrs H3 and I visited some years ago which had promised much and delivered very little. But from the
While I am sure this show has been on for a while, I am amazed that tonight was my first time watching it. This show is amazing in many different ways, not only are there some sensational designers but the prize they receive is absolutely brilliant. Every week each designer has a task in creating a new original look based of their own style. After they create these looks they have models show them on the runway and their item gets a bid.
*I owe this to Max Deutscher.
Our afternoons mission was to head to the West and try follow up on the Buffalo herd that had been located this morning. Having chosen our route we slowly made our way in that direction but we then got news that another station was driving that route from the South so a quick change of plan was in order. I always say things happen for a reason and on this occasion it became apparent rather quickly. Heading on our new route I received a message from Marka informing me that he had found Shindzuti at Java Dam. On our new coarse we only had to make a minor adjustment and we were on the bush highway in his direction. It did not take us long at all to get into the area but unfortunately this rather shy Leopard had become mobile from his resting spot in a tree and was now walking through some very thick stuff, only reminiscent to stuff I've ever seen when playing golf. We got to see him literally for a minute or two before he disappeared away into the surrounding bush, clearly not wanting to be seen. While trying to relocate on him we received an invitation to go visit Mtenga-tenga, our large male Rhino, or the female and her calf in the open plains in the South. Not having any luck in finding our Shadow, that is what Shindzuti means in Shangaan, we took our leave and took up the offer to head South and visit the Rhino. We chose to head for mom and her calf as the two of them are always a special sighting and this afternoon was to be no different. As we sat there with them our little White Rhino seems to be having an identity crisis as she thinks she is a Black Rhino with her browsing on a small tree. It was hilarious to watch as she gummed the tree and finally when it was not to her taste she used it to scratch an itch. A little tree for a
5. Be a people’s guy.
In order for someone to be motivated to seek revenge, they must identify an injustice done to them—real or not. We did not necessarily do them any wrong, but they perceive and believe our behavior to be inappropriate, unacceptable, unfair or unjust. Sometimes they are right. Nevertheless, their covert, devious reaction is still not excused. But now we have a place to start when trying to diffuse the passive-aggressive.
Flag Banner is a stamp
It’s not just a Surya or an Aamir Khan problem. We might not notice it, but it is all around us. Ok, I shouldn’t dare speak about others, but yes, I do suffer from it. I am not proud of it, but I do suffer from short term memory loss. Maybe not all the memories just go, but most times it is the most important ones that just slip my mind.
through the Creating is Fun dt.. Martha will also have the main Design Team listed just incase
4. A single-payor US health-insurance company with mandatory purchase, an aggressively accurate usual & customary remibursement rate; a target to pay the average of developed market costs for pharma, and a fair method of sharing the cost of those unable to afford the averaged premium across the risk pool.
the scene when investigators
If the buddy programme ever sent out a letter to parents, it might go: ”Fortunately for us today, all of our children are happy, healthy, free, helpful, safe and learning to be decent citizens.”
6.What do you think your greatest challenge is going to be this round?
- The city government of Chicago has gotten so unwieldy and inefficient, that anyone who wants to open a business has to go through an extremely complex and bewildering licensing process. It has gotten so bad, that you can now get a city license to help other people get a city license.
The warm weather "treat" has gone and it is plenty cold again. They say if you don't like the weather in Texas just wait til tomorrow and it will change, that's for sure. I am sure glad to see you today, we are going to have lots of wonderful food here to warm us up, with good laughs and fellowship to enjoy. I can't wait to see what you have brought today.
well yes, Caning. It does reveal & conceal- that is Sexy.
Well Thanks for dropping by, can't wait to see
You will become more successful in Forex trading by letting profits run. It is important when doing this that you do not get too greedy. Once you figure out how to make trades, you will also figure out the proper point at which to remove your money from the mix.
Ken = Know/Reckon/Understand, Poppy = Money,
Feedback/question? contact me at labsolutepitch@live.fr or
Boo!
Look! Here is the view again out my plane window of Buffalo and the ice blocking the lake. Wow. The saints prayed and the ice cracked just long enough for the boat to get through, then it closed right behind them after they passed. So this won't melt for at least another couple months. In this day and age it wasn't a problem because my life wasn't in danger and I flew right over it. Back then it was a major struggle.
Share this story
Doing my due diligence on the convention delegates , I'm thinking Styn, Haas, and Corman for the delegates, and Settle, Flavin and Salmon for the alternates. Maher for Auditor General, because his opponent seems to be simultaneously a dilettante *and* a banking lobbyist, which isn't what I'm looking for in a glorified Head Accountant for the Commonwealth.
As I'm running waaaaayyyy behind now, they had to be quite simple. I used some backing paper from the TH seasonal paper stack, and stamped some script onto it (Andy Skinner - Simply Angelic). I then used some of the images from the paper stack (music etc). After printing the digi, I went over it in Old Paper DI, then around the edges with Frayed Burlap. I coloured the hat with a little Festive Berries DI, went over the colour with a clear Spica pen, then added some Ivory Flowersoft for the bobbles on the hat. Sentiments printed on my pc, and some raffia to finish.. Done!
And that’s the first half of my grief. *waves a hand* The second half is a spoiler, but those who stick around to read Phantom Pain (second book) will know it when they see it.
Well, let me direct you to our fiction section.
Ayd Instone works with people to explore and unlock their creative ideas in ways they may never have thought possible, to inspire innovation in their lives, and their business.
Oh yeah, the boots! I got them from Bluefly a few years ago and I love them. They are my notch above the ordinary Ugg boots and probably get more compliments than they should.
We have five copies of Sally Nicholls' All Fall Down to give away this month. Just give the best answer to this question, to enter: "What historical place would you most like to visit, and why?"
Perhaps this sounds familiar — it should, if you are a homosapien. We have a very strongly ingrained fight-flight-freeze response, which lives in one of the oldest parts of our brain, the limbic system. The amygdala (small, almond-shaped groups of nuclei located deep within the brain) is a key part of this system, and its main function is to scan for threats. It’s one of the earliest parts of the brain to develop , both historically and developmentally. In other words, as humans we’ve had it for a loooooong time, and it’s one part of the brain that is highly developed at birth.
How I Feel
“I did not really get you. Care to explain?” she asked him.
In the Chikwaka Reserve, Makwara, the son of Mashonganyika asked a part of the country for his sons and Chikwaka agreed to give him the part which lies between Goromonzi office and the Umtali/Salisbury railway line. On the east the boundary i the Nhoro River with the country of Chief Rusike. Makwara gave Chief Chikwaka on ox to thank him for that land.
So yeah, I know I said I’d post about events that brought me up to being in the mental health field but meh, I’ll do it if anyone becomes interested or even starts to read this.
Tonight, Blondie Daughter had Buttercup around for tea.
I don’t know what to do. I should have listened to the warnings. I should have seen the signs. I thought I knew how to handle it. But I was wrong.
I don't want to tackle the living room until we get the electrical work done.
So, um bottom line, maybe I'm okay after all. Right. I'm a mature sophisticated woman. (Shut up. This is MY fantasy.) And maybe I'm not the only one with an inner child squealing I don't wanta pull your finger.
1/4 cup organic cornmeal
We’ll see how this goes, and I don’t see me being uber skinny anytime soon….
A Polish Heart… Darrin is an architect in Boston. His parents are rich and society focused. His mother is pushing for him to get married, but to someone she deems acceptable, not necessarily someone he wants. He has earned a trip to Poland to collaborate on a stadium project. His interpreter is Sofia who works for the construction company in Warsaw. They both feel an attraction to the other. Darrin only has a week and wants to make the best of their time together. Sofia doesn’t want her heart broken and insists on keeping things as friends only. He asks her out. Her father wants to meet him and Darrin obliges. He apparently did everything right, because her parents love him. The more time he spends with Sofia and her family, the more he considers staying in Poland. Her family life is the exact opposite of his…something he has always desired. He wants to stay for Easter, but his mother is pressuring him to return home. He is “inconveniencing” her and her plans. After working through a couple snags with his current job and finding employment in Poland, he is able to stay and pursue things with Sofia.
It was the exact opposite of how I run on the roads. I felt naked and out of my comfort zone. Totally. I passed a few people and decided I was running at a decent pace and suddenly really enjoying myself. The race director was out on a bike, and he said some nice, encouraging things too.
you, get you that freedom
Oh how beautiful the carpet can look
Before I had kids I swore that they would never be allowed to watch much TV. I've always been uncomfortable with television being used as a baby sitter and I always imagined them playing creatively with their toys, helping me around the house or letting me read to them. Then I had a real child. A real child who is loud, bored easily and whose idea of creativity is stamping my kitchen table permanently with pictures of blue mice.
What's even better is that you only need half of the kit to make this, so you could make two - one for yourself and one as a gift! Here are the other pages:
9am-9:45am Beginner Tap (Teen/Adult)
I gotta say this beer surprised me. I was not expecting much. When Kona first made a splash on the Austin scene I had my reservations. Without hearing any rumblings in the beer underworld, all of sudden every supermarket in town had huge displays of Kona Brewing's offerings. It seemed a bit fishy to me. And it made me wary of their beers. Why had I not heard about this earlier? Just who is pushing these beers on us? .... You know what I am saying?
If you feel a lump near the top of your belly (usually on one side or the other) push lightly on it. Then:
Referring to how Romans conquered villages in the Mediterranean in the Middle Ages, Armendariz said, “They’d go into a little Turkish town somewhere, they’d find the first five guys they saw and they’d crucify them.”
Rub the surface of the ribs with the remaining dry rub - ready for smoking.
The Assembly passed the bill by a 51-18 vote with four abstentions. The Senate approved it 24-9. Christie has until January 19 to sign it into law. If he does not, what is known as a "pocket veto" occurs, and the bill must begin the legislative process all over again.
…I got my brows & lip threaded. Now to most of you that probably doesn’t sound like the makings of a great day, but let me tell you, for someone with naturally thick, nicely-shaped brows that can turn into a hairy, unkempt mess without upkeep, it is perfection. When my brows look good, my whole face is brighter, and I feel lit-from-within pretty. And as much as I loving wearing makeup everyday, nothing in the world can replace that “makeup optional” feeling.
Four important sides were cut in October 1955 (Coast Concert): Struttin' With Some Barbecue, Muskrat Ramble, Do You Know What It Means To Miss New Orleans, and Bugle Call Rag, with Jack Teagarden joining in on Bugle Call Rag. During January 1957 Bobby appeared with Eddie Condon's band at Constitution Hall in Washigton and, at this time, performed with the National Symphony Orchestra as guest soloist. In November 1956 he put together a sextet to play the Voyager Room at the Henry Hudson Hotel on 57th Street. The ensemble presented a wide ranging repertoire which included dixieland, bop, cool jazz and even 'mood music'. In late summer 1957 the group embarked on a tour of the United States and Canada. Also during 1957 the band produced an album for Capitol (T857), The Gotham Jazz Scene, which featured some very nice Dick Cary arrangements. Bobby also made additional recordings with Jack Teagarden: Jazz Ultimate. Coast Concert and Jazz Ultimate appear together on the Dormouse label (DM1 CD X02). In November of 1957 the Hackett sextet was recorded live at The Embers. After the tour, Bobby returned to studio work but continued to play occasional club dates in New York. In 1959 a Hackett quartet including Dave McKenna(P), Bob Carter(b), and Richard Scott(dr), recorded twelve sides for Capitol.
for Aristotle to sit,
Add the gnocchi to the boiling water a few at a time. They will dance around and rise to the surface within a few minutes, and once they've hung out on top for a minute or so, they're done! Take them out with a slotted spoon.
A great example in Bible history of a bounded set is found in the reading from Acts today. The travelling treasurer – a eunuch from Ethiopia who went to Jerusalem – encounters Philip the evangelist on the road. This man had come to worship! (v27). It is not surprizing that an Ethiopian should do that. There had been Jews in Ethiopia since the time of King Solomon. (Isaiah 11:11 and 56:4-5 refer to Ethiopia and to eunuchs by the way).
I really don't have anything important to say....but I feel like I should blog anyway. I seem to have gotten away from my old blog habits, reading and writing often. Part of that is because my life is busier now. I'm not sure if you are anything like me but when I have a lot going on in my life, I get very ADD-ish (no offense to ADD patients). I often feel like I can't concentrate, or focus on one topic. The thoughts and ideas I have are all floating around and banging into each other in my brain....all trying to be the first in line. That is exactly how I have been lately. There are only two things that calm my brain down enough to allow me to fall asleep at night. Xanax and reading. Not that all these thoughts are bad thoughts, or that I am upset...sometimes the info is useless shopping lists and goofy stuff.
‘No,’ Sydrill said.
4 Responses to “The House of Rothschild”
Surprised by their unwieldy acquisition and wondering if Candy and Bob were planning to ride the horse back to Ohio, Candy assured me that she had recently used UPS to send purchases from the tiny little town of Oaxaca, Mexico without any hitches. Therefore, it shouldn't be a problem to ship something from an international city like Paris, right?
And this is the problem with Rand Paul’s answer to Rachel Maddow. His belief is that if a restaurant discriminates against its customers, the people will stop shopping there. The restaurant will then be forced to change its discriminatory policy or to close. In Paul’s mind, there’s no need for the imprecise and clumsy power of government to address the issue. The market will regulate itself. Yet Paul’s assumption in all of this is a healthy civic community. It is only when we have a healthy sense of connection to our neighbors that we will wield the power of the free market healthily. But as it stands, we are well aware of the negative effects of pornography on women, yet we go on buying. Likewise, we are aware of the abusive nature of what Naomi Wolf calls The Beauty Myth, a lie continually peddled by cosmetic companies. But we go on buying. And as the Gulf Coast oil crisis has made abundantly clear, we’ll keep buying oil too, despite the havoc it has wreaked on countless lives.
Next day, add dried apricot mixture to fresh apricot mixture. Stirring, simmer until thickens and remove vanilla beans. Put the jam in jars and seal in water bath.
Surprisingly Brad is an amazing pie maker. This recipe has been passed down from my family and from my Great Grandmother who owned a bake shop. Sadly I cannot bake so it has now been passed down from my Mom to Brad lol.
Although I have yet to officially publish my novels, just being in San Francisco has helped me re-awaken that looming giant within me. The city, the area, screams of the artistic vibe that infuses into my soul and mind. Everywhere I turn, there’s something to appreciate, something to perhaps tack onto a future storyline.
Good Morning everyone! Well, it is raining a little over here today and what a perfect day to challenge y'all to create something using an "Umbrella" on your creation. It can be a card, a layout, or an altered item..Just go create and have fun!
yes, we had dinner out and will again very soon...ya'll have discovered my favorite cause...supporting the local economy...
8. Asos Ballet Wrap Cardigan - A long sleeved, cropped length, ballet-style wrap sweater that will masterfully hide the daring exposed back of the bodysuit and keep you comfy and warm with its angora blend fibers. The sweetly pink tone provides a feminine touch of color to offset all the other black components of the outfit.
He shrugged and went on. “It makes sense really; you’re bound to do something basic like that eventually, so if you have a common dream, its going to seem strange when it comes true.”
Last year we did not have the opportunity to participate in the walk. When these same people who we are joining this year were walking in 2010, my Eslea had yet to be born. Jason and I had yet to know of her extra chromosome. Our lives had not yet been touched by our little miracle and changed forever.
Back to Brandon. Unlike myself, Brandon's mom was not a model parent. The woman had no job. She and Brandon survived on Gov't assistance. But that didn't keep her home. For at night, and I do mean EVERY NIGHT she patrolled the bars up and down Amarillo Boulevard.
Final score: 20 out of 30 (not bad?), 3 1/2 stars out of 5, 69% out of 100%
I had the best idea ever to this post while working out at the gym today, but it has disappeared somewhere and I can't find it again. So this will just be random, again. It's Friday though. I could do some movies in a list, but I really don't feel like it.
Ultimately, though, none of this is forever. My teacher's hours frustrate me at times, but the flip side is that I get vacations with my kids. This year that's mostly been Jo, because he is on a public school schedule. Over the summer we can take Cho out of daycare (but keep her spot for a small fee) so I'll get the time with her, too. And next year will bring more changes, since Jo will be in kindergarten. He will likely attend an afterschool program with hours just late enough so that I can pick him up, at least some of the time.
From loose sketches, the final drawing is revealed.
Given these ominous trends, it hardly comes as a surprise that the resistance to immigration and Islamization originated mainly with the working class.
Why be a martyr on Main Street in Anytown, USA, when in New York City, riding the N train from Coney Isand with a cockatoo will be met with either indifference, amusement or delight? I have seen a wide range of very unusual pets in public in New York City, many of them illegal to own. Can you ride the subway in New York City with a cockatoo? What do you want first - the Legal Answer or the Practical Answer? :)
Taste is a rich big bad malty affair; maybe not the best balance but definitely rich, bold, aggressive, intimidating, well pumped of booze, whiskey, smoke, wood, oak, lots of wood chip, slight grainial element, leather, earthyness, bitterness is fantastic, so so mourish and drinkability is not bad for something this potent!
I've been as busy as a bee trying to arrange all the
Now, at this moment, I have a rare and unexpected moment of peace. Wonder Boy and Pod are out playing putt-putt, and Her Majesty fell asleep in her high chair during lunch. I am going to nibble some chocolate and make some progess on my book.
i am with my sissy, the SWWM, but it has been lovely so far. Me and my niece shoveled the snow today, and hopefully the roads will be clear tomorrow so we can go to my conference....
The discussion, which organisers expect to be “invigorating and enlivening”, is fully booked but will be streamed live online on February 23.
Powers Richard
In just four and a half days, the team, primarily from Newfoundland, Canada, was able to log more than 370 volunteer hours, collaborating with six different families and ultimately affecting the lives of 27 family members. The group worked side by side with the Habitat’s partner families and several local volunteers to work together for the improvement of the homes and the neighborhood. Their presence will remain in the community since they left a piece of Canada in La Matanza and gave the residents from this informal settlement in the suburbs of Buenos Aires the chance to get to know Newfoundland and make new friends.
Citrus salt, Italian salt and Moroccan salt. I just bought rock salt and added different herbs and spice combinations. The Moroccan one has coriander (cilantro) cumin, chilli flakes, black pepper corns, and the Italian has chilli flakes, oregano, onions flakes and garlic flakes and black pepper corns. The Citrus is just the zest of two lemons dried in the microwave and added to the rock salt then ground in my little electric grinder.
The one thought I struggle with is, what is the purpose? Why art, why do people make sacrifices to fulfil their dreams? I believe it is because they find purpose in their craft. I used to think that creating art did not do much for anyone else but myself, which is not true. My art can help others as well. What would be selfish is if I kept all that is within me to myself and never shared it with the world.
William and Jane get a room in a hotel (checking in as Mr. and Mrs. Millard Fillmore) and go for a swim in a lake. William wears the bottom of one of Jane's suits, which is "designed to go out where he didn't go out and go in where he didn't go in." Jane only swims briefly, but William swims out far.
i will add in a little bit of allsorts all new stash from ribbon to stamps to stickers and patterned papers, enough for you to make a few cards with.
Benny Breeze
23.The Wanton Song (Page/Plant)
I have wondered for a long time where theists come up with the idea that the Big Bang posits that everything came from nothing. Is this error genuinely the result of naivety, or is it a deliberate distortion? I don’t know, but I would like to believe it’s the former, because I don’t think (or don’t want to think) religious people make up nonsense for the sole purpose of upsetting others with false accusations.
I'm sorry that I can't bring you all, but if there are tickets still available please do come and say hi! (Pink tights, oh yes!)
I spent the first week back from the midwest trying like crazy to find an apartment and new job. In the last two weeks I’ve gotten both and nearly at the same time.
The Princess and the Diamonds: Princess Gabrielle can’t sleep at night. There is something hard in her bed. No, not just the stolen diamonds tucked under her mattress, but the handsome Marquis on it….whose carnal talents she can’t resist. But he threatens her secret mission, and worse, she stands to lose far more than the diamonds—her heart is at stake….
125g porridge oats
and best of all for most exciting,
While previously, these souls have been forced to stay hidden in the shadows whilst going about their work for the Light and for the planet and whilst communicating with the Ascended Masters and many other ascended souls who are helping them with the relocating of the funds that will see the glorious new temporary financial system enacted on your world, these souls will now be able to come to the fore of the perception of your general public in more real ways especially on your internet, and this is wonderful for the exposure of all that has been happening on your world has needed to be garnered for so very long.
Glassware: Snifter, Pint
NFS Undercover
-vanilla whey protein
Please link your creations below by Sunday, May 6th to play along. Winner and Tea Time Terrific Top Three will be announced Monday, May 7th. We will have an all-new challenge for you to play along with on the 7th as well, so please come back and visit with us again for another chance to win!
This was the second year for the Beat the Heat 5K and fun run. They added a 10K and hired a local race director to oversee the racing. Both were good choices to keep the race improving and getting runners to come out. The normal time for the race is in late April and that’s where I think it gets its name. North Texas heat sets in early in our neighborhood. The race benefits Family Promise of Irving, a chapter of Family Promise that seeks to overcome homelessness among families in our area. The organization partners with local churches to provide temporary shelter and day services to assist families that are recently homeless to get back on their feet. My church is one of the partners as well as many others in Irving. This race is one way that Family Promise of Irving raises funds for their mission.
him again.
Argument from ignorance asserts a proposition is true because it has not yet been proven false.
For the Gallery page I was going to use Pictobrowser to show all my images in one long slide show but realised that the average attention span of the viewer browsing the internet is around 5 seconds and no one would have the patience to watch that many slides. Therefore influenced by Daniel Burman’s website and his gallery page, I decided to show the best photo from each gallery and use it as a link to the gallery there in, with the galleries title in the corner of the image.
Johnstone was snared in a probe of the Brooklyn South narcotics squad in 2008. Part of the probe included a sting operation by the Internal Affairs Bureau and an undercover posing as a drug dealer. Two Brooklyn cops were charged with stealing 40 bags of crack cocaine and $250 in cash from the undercover. Johnstone was fired from the police department after his conviction.
Know that the LORD, he is God!
However, the shortlist of BAD papers includes: Watercolor, SU! (SU! is intended for blending water-based markers so Copics are tricky on this paper), and stampers should not get fine-art Marker paper (it's too thin for your use and you can't fix mistakes).
In all honesty, it's not obvious how to respond on a practical basis to this imbroglio. On one level, I'm grateful to Cal Performances for bringing the orchestra here, and I can't deny that I'm looking forward to hearing the concerts.
"And Jesus grew in wisdom and stature, and in favor with God and man."
The Dom are a poorly understood ethnic minority living across a number of Middle Eastern countries, including Lebanon, Jordan, the occupied Palestinian territory, Turkey, Iraq and Iran. Like gypsy communities in Europe, historians believe the Dom are descendants of travelling performers who migrated westwards from India centuries ago.
So let’s go Christian husbands, wives and singles. Let’s agree to God ‘making’ us over…first!
1 can (49 ½ oz.) ready-to-serve chicken broth
I could say that I miss you, but how would these three words ever communicate the ache burrowing into my chest, trying to find you?
The first man responds: "You don't say, I'm from Ireland too! Let's have another round to Ireland."
Yacht firms and agencies broker yacht purchases additionally to coordinate maintenance and repair tasks related to yacht possession. Since sheer size a yacht obtain is pretty big with regards to many you’ll find single day purchases, yacht brokers are specifically trained and experienced to keep up large purchase transactions. They are able to explain and suggest the legal aspects and nuances of multi-billion dollar purchases like individuals of the mega yacht offered.
The clock is ticking…
Except that the Featherweight threads right to left, and this one threads left to right. Which was a bit of a WTF moment, but we got past it.
Getting fit and staying fit are a challenge, but I am making efforts to stay motivated and make some changes in my daily life to improve my physical fitness. What do you do to stay healthy?
To identify what he is asking of us. Not what we think he is asking.
ExtremeTech’s guide to air cooling your PC - Blowing room-temperature air across heatsinks is an effective way to mitigate heat. This guide aims to help you maximize air flow through your case.
We are being hounded by the Government, paying more money for a pension (which is the highest public sector pension), which is going to be worth peanuts, getting less money for putting our lives at risk for the sake of our community and our families, so next time you say ‘I pay your wages’, just think Do you? Do you really? Some of you might contribute, as we do, to our wages, but see it as a positive, because soon you will be paying for security officers, and Police Officers just might be a thing of the past.
Than they’ll ever know
17. Skullflower: Sorcerer's mix (Portugal the man)
Cybersmart set a precedent amongst South African ISP’s when it launched the Nightrider add-on, giving our clients the option of a window period that customized their accounts to receive a discount on their data cap used during certain hours of the day. Scheduling your downloads to run during those hours ,meant that you’ll ultimately be saving cap and money.
And it’s the answers that have driven you here
___ something that shows you haven’t read my blog, e.g. “Since you enjoy reviewing political thrillers…”?
Had I done the same run during the day, encountering the same number of people, and heard the same noises, I wouldn’t have noticed them much…I suppose in the dark, the fear of the unknown is heightened (I wasn’t scared, but more aware).
"That's what all art's about - a sense of moving away
Not much new to report on this end. Work has been crazy busy and I feel like I have spent more time in the last month away from home than I have spent at home. The only perk to this is that the Hubby has pretty much finished all of the packing. YEA!! He still rocks...
The fusion of abstract sound and looped melody was the key to An Empty Bliss‘s cavernous atmosphere and the awkward, divorced feel of the two on Patience seems like a step backwards. As far as content goes, the wistful lounge loops are once again ubiquitous, but without proper processing, they don’t invoke the same feeling of deja-vu that Kirby crafted so well on his previous release. At over forty minutes, the songs begin to get monotonous, especially considering they are almost exclusively piano samples. More variety in instrumentation or even in effects would have given this record a better sense of direction or momentum, but as it stands one cannot help but wish it were at the very least more concise.
HAWAIIAN BAKED PORK CHOPS
Level 18: Reduces the damage received from the enemies by 14%.
I hope you enjoy your Easter Holiday, and thanks for stopping by!
You either love Peter Mayle or you hate him. I'm in the first group. His books conjure up for me all the sights, sounds, tastes and smells of Provence - which I have, I must confess, never visited apart from the (very) odd weekend on the Cote d'Azur. Peter Mayle's Provence is full of charmingly eccentric Anglophile locals, rural idylls, comical dogs, good cheap wine, blue curls of woodsmoke, the chink of pétanque balls, village fetes, truffle deals, fabulous sunsets, pastis tastings, goat races, long lunches, and honest workmen. I'm not so sure this Provence actually existed when Mayle wrote the book, and it certainly doesn't now he's ruined it. I suspect you'd be lucky to find a real French person anywhere between Aix en Provence and Draguignan these days.
it's hard to explain without scaring her.
Check this link to Glacier Country - a visitor guide to both Fox Glacier and Franz Josef Glacier. It gives you an overview of both glaciers and what you can do there.
@jailbr3akpod @onyimanick
Diet is regarded as the first line of treatment in Chinese medicine; acupuncture and herbal treatments are used only after changes in diet fail to cure the problem. Chinese medicine uses foods to keep the body in internal harmony and in a state of balance with the external environment.
There are people that do not like us, do not like Sun News, do not like me, do not like Byline.
–From Bill in Portland Maine.
But, insists Andersen, “when I read the title of your book, I read it as ‘questions about origins are over.’” To which Krauss responds: “Well, if that hook gets you into the book that’s great. But in all seriousness, I never make that claim. … If I’d just titled the book ‘A Marvelous Universe,’ not as many people would have been attracted to it.”
I only know that I want to it to be a door…
When I read about someone’s struggle, when I am talking to people, when someone specifically asks me to pray for them or for the loved ones in their life, when I see someone or some-thing happening in public; I pick up my prayer booklet (I call it my prayer journal). I write the person’s name or write a note about the situation, then I PRAY for God’s Will in their lives.
Every Sunday from 11am-3pm Primitivo in Venice hosts brunch on their patio. The menu (available here) features a nice mix of breakfast and lunch items (just as brunch should) all around $10-$18 a pop. The items on the cheaper side are more breakfast oriented (scrambled ricotta-chive eggs, strawberry french toast, carmelized leak and onion bread pudding), while the items on the pricier side tend to be heavier and more lunch/linner focused (steak frites, paella, salmon with apple smoked bacon crust… yum…)
If not for You, my life would be in shambles. So often have I made decisions that would have torn me in two, if not for You holding it all together. Paths of self-destruction were made smooth by You. Day by day You deliver me from myself. You give me hope and joy to carry me through the storms.
Two well-known conferences with grants:
Hi, I'm Debby and I live in NW Ohio and am taking care of my mom in her twilight years.
Fool or genius? You be the judge.
The passenger was detained and handed over to security personnel for questioning, PIA said, and the plane was searched and found safe.
Is it dark enough?
Annual database storage to keep the file with Outskirts Press is an additional $18, many other POD publishers can charge anything upwards of $25.
nest, was glorious, but also a bit sad, many
There was a pretense of rules they were told to abide by, knowing fully well they would ignore them with impunity since Temple's Security Police were passive observers. This guy heckled through out Robert Spencer's and Pamela Geller's opening remarks (note Security is YAWNING)
The government wants children to learn what will help the system itself, not what's good for the individual or the community. There are also much more important, to the system, anyway, lessons taught in school than what's "learned" about the "core subjects" (see John Taylor Gatto's The Six-Lesson School Teacher).
Green Turtle Cay: a Fantasy
Oh! do not stain with guiltless blood Thy hospitable hearth! Nor triumph that thy wiles betrayed A prize so little worth.
What was the most challenging part of being in the competition?
Now, normally one just accepts that the New Black Panthers are a pack of lunatics and moves on, but this time they've got Big DemocRat support from the Rev. Al Sharpton, the Rev. Jesse Jackson, and the well known Chicago community organizer Mr. Barack Obama.
1998
and as long as you live it will be in your arms
So when we got to talking her drunk self opened up and she confided to me she had a husband who left her because “alitosheka na kuma.” She also told me that she was young and “innocent” (meaning naive) na “alikuwa anaji-force kwake, bwana hakuwa anampenda…Ati huyo jamaa alimchukulia: “Yeye tu ni kafala ambako alikatoa nyumbani, hakajui jiji, hakana pesa, kanamtegemea kabisa kwa kila kitu, hakana namna hata hakajui kuuza kuma kakapata pesa…” The way she said it, it was obvious from the tone that this guy really mistreated her. I don’t know how a man can treat a woman like this one so bad. Sijui…
God solves being blue or discouragement – by giving people hope, focusing them on the future, and putting them to work. One of the reasons people are sometimes blue is they can’t see the future and especially a future for themselves. Sometimes just talk will not totally help a blue person and more needs to be done in their lives. God broke Elijah’s discouragement by putting him to work and He will break your discouragement by giving you a task!
And it is
Thank you friends.. we'll see you during the week.
I feel like my heart is a seed and it is being
So I'm doing this at her house.
Thank you so much for enriching my life and putting up with me all these years!! HA!
For more information on the Wankel design follow the links by clicking on the highlighted and underlined phrases in the article above.
1. Cook the pasta according to package directions, omitting salt and fat. Drain pasta in a colander over a bowl, reserving 1/4-1/2 cup cooking liquid. Combine shrimp, onions, and garlic in a small bowl.
- What focal length would that be? – I asked. My concern was to stay within 50mm and 28 mm because that was the best to shoot the sets of the size I had.
2. Combine soy sauce and the next 5 ingredients (thru garlic) in a large zip top plastic bag.
Lyrics – Tim Rice
4) Timing Is Crucial
Chinese herbalists recommend that magnolia bark not be used by pregnant women and that magnolia flower be used with caution if the patient is dehydrated.
Oh here's the final cake if you're interested ... I don't know why I bothered crumb-coating ...
On a personal note, I know my output has been low this month. I am finishing work on my book (really), and expect to get back up to speed next week.
Sweet and crunchy, this granola is great served with fruit and milk for breakfast, stirred into yogurt or sprinkled on ice cream. It's also a fun recipe for kids to help mix.
Thomas E. Burnett Jr., 38, San Ramon, Calif.
"I don't think we are."
Leviathan Wakes is book one in what is being called The Expanse series. You can find more information at The Expanse.
I loved Asher and Devin. Who wouldn't love these two angels?
I've also had a great time reading Calder Wood Press' catalogue of pamphlets, so that I can give Colin a bit of help on the website, though to be honest he doesn't really need it, as he has everything set up really efficiently.
Ever once in a while I have a dish made by someone else that is truly inspiring. The most inspiring chef I know is Yoshio and has been for quite some time, now. He made me a mushroom omelette once, that I made each and every single day until I had it right (the way he made it!) A while back he made me a delicious summer salad, and this is my attempt to reproduce it. This one is bit involved, but worth it. It is cold salad, so you want to keep veggies chilled and cook the noodles a little before serving time to bring them to a cool temp.
Phew....I did it. Yesterday I decided that today would be the day that I tested the old chassis to see if she would hold up in the long haul just walking, no jogging allowed. I also wanted to see if I "hit the wall" at all. I started at 8:20AM and went 20 miles. Yup, 20! I finished at 2:08PM. The most boring 5 hours and 48 minutes that I can ever recall. At mile 10 I had to stop and check the bottom of my right heel, as it was hurting something awful. Couldn't see anything, so just kept going as best I could. I stopped at the house for a few minutes and put on a blister bandage. It didn't seem to help. My feet in general are "my wall." I walked to Fullerton Road and back 3 times, then once around Rowland High School. I never really felt any big difference that I would say would make me unable to finish (just the feet)!
Do not get overly enthusiastic with the attractive look involving cars as you can pass up to think about its features for important. Investing in appropriate product will make you happier as well as pleased. Explore the various styles purchasing.
graphic
I'm also not a fan of both love triangles (especially in young adult) and instant-love. This had both. And the love triangle was lame because she obviously liked Kai more, which just irritated me because Tempest and Kai had a case of instant-love.
Look, here's the thing. People were free to make their own alcohol during Prohibition. Drinking was never illegal. Prohibition "only" outlawed was the sale, import and manufacture of alcohol. Just like Proctor, the prohibitionists blamed an industry for a habit which they detested. They thought that if they put the industry out of business, drinking would virtually disappear. They couldn't imagine that people drank because they liked it, just as today's tobacco prohibitionists cannot imagine that people smoke because they like it.
The flirtation began innocently enough over a dinner buffet.......
There are other levels of change you can create within you as well changes outside yourself, i.e. the people around you, where you spend your time, your physical environment. This is why vacations are so helpful. We get out of an old pattern into an entirely different space. It’s why changing offices, redecorating, etc. can raise the energy. Letting go of staff that are no longer in agreement or bringing in new staff at a higher vibration creates a sudden success.
I was notified today by my friend M that today marks the one year anniversary of this blog. Last year, on May 10th I decided, almost on a whim, that I would blog everyday for a year. It was a decision that has become a pretty significant part of my daily life at this point. Even after doing this for a year, it is weird for me that I don’t have a set routine for this; everyday I am just winging it. To be clear, this is probably the most inefficient and failure prone way of going about blogging or building any habit for that matter. It is clumsy and often gets relegated as an after thought especially if I have a particularly eventful day. But in the end, somehow this is what I have come to practice and oddly enough it has become a habit now, may be not the best one, but still. The result of this unstructured, and to be honest, unfocused way of operating is actually very convenient, in that there is literally no planning involved. I don’t get concerned with what to write about or how long the post was going to be until actually sitting to down to do it. Of course, the convenience dissipates as soon as the blank page on the laptop screen stares at me as the vertical cursor impatiently blinks, waiting for me to type letters and words in a worryingly delightful exercise of forming good sentences. I say delightful because that is what I feel when I finish typing. I say worrying because it does not happen that easily and the whole process is rather unpleasant.
Happy Confessing!!
His acting career hasn't gone anywhere. In fact, he's basically sitting on his butt in his little hometown doing not much of anything important. Meanwhile, the Virginal Three are: a professional actor, an attorney, and a full professor...yeah, we're a bunch of losers, all right. *smirk*
“Parlez Moi d’Amour”
They sat within the right angle of each corner, facing off against each other in a retail tug-of-war for customers. The cafe where I worked was located just two doors down from the bakery, a nice location from which to lure the passing shopper.
Vanessa: Nothing..its just...a love scene? Do you really think someone at your writing level should attempt to write a love scene?
9. Place the loaves on the cookie sheet (or on a pizza paddle dusted with plenty of cornmeal). Let sit for 40 min under plastic or a damp kitchen towel.
me: "That is exactly right and it's the same with anything that is hard at first."
Since there are literally scores of bloggers who might fit this bill, I have decided to narrow down my criteria to Australian bloggers who write predominantly about e-learning (or something related).
Wishing you a wonderful day my dear friends and as always thank you so much for stopping by and for all your lovely comments. Hope to catch up with you soon.
That training was fun and I felt pushed. But I don’t hunger for the pain that something like a marathon brings. Nope. I’d only train like Merit if it was as easy for me to do as it was for her. Pass me some vampire genetics and I’ll spar for hours. In human form I’ll stick to the easy stuff.
Starting at 6 p.m., the Wisconsin Youth Symphony Orchestras’ Board of Directors invites all members of our community to celebrate youth music education at the “Art of Note” Gala, WYSO’s annual fundraising event that recycles violins into art objects for sale. The gala will feature an evening of live music, delicious gourmet cuisine, wine, locally brewed beer, and live and silent auctions.
Do the mixing bit just before you serve, as it also heats up the chicken wings in the process.
